

Electric Hoist, AC Winch, DC Winch, Self Recovery Winch, Winch and Hoist Manufacturer, Car Winch Manufacturer, Winch Accessories Manufacturer 


























   
 Chi Zong Machine Co., Ltd. was established in 1979, we have been the leading manufacturer of compact electric hoist and winch in Taiwan. 
DUKE is the brand we are selling worldwide, while STRONG is our domestic brand in Taiwan. 
 
Our product range as follows: 
AC Power: Electric Wire Rope Winch, Electric Chain Hoist 
DC Power: Off-Road Winch..ATV & UTV winch 
Battery Type: Battery Wire Rope Winch, Battery Chain Hoist 
We also provide OEM/ODM solutions for customizations.. 
 
With strict quality control, e...
more


























																	ELECTRIC MINI WIRE WINCH
																


 











																	ELECTROMAGNETISM
																


 











																	ELECTRIC MINI CHAIN HOIST
																


 











																	ELECTRIC INVERSION CHAIN HOIST
																


 











																	BATTERY BABY WINCH
																


 











																	BATTERY BABY CHAIN HOIST
																


 











																	COMPACT WINCH
																


 











																	ELECTRIC CHAIN HOIST
																


 












more









search







2014 INTERNATIONALE 
We sincerely invite you to vist us at BOOTH No.G-070


Ex... 


NEW PRODUCTS   
"NEW PRODUCTS"
 BATTERY BABY WINCH
MODEL:DCW-250... 

more 








			
TEL：+886-2-2267-7370   |   FAX：+886-2-2267-7380   |   E-MAIL：sales@duke-winch.com    |   SKYPE：dukewinch
Web： www.duke-winch.com   |  ADD： 6, TATUNG ST., TUCHENG DIST., NEW TAIPEI CITY 23679, TAIWAN   
    Copyright © 2009 CHI ZONG MACHINE CO., LTD.  |  The website requires the at least IE7 or below IE7
			
Web Design 









Electric Hoist, AC Winch, DC Winch, Self Recovery Winch, Winch and Hoist Manufacturer, Car Winch Manufacturer, Winch Accessories Manufacturer 


























   
 Chi Zong Machine Co., Ltd. was established in 1979, we have been the leading manufacturer of compact electric hoist and winch in Taiwan. 
DUKE is the brand we are selling worldwide, while STRONG is our domestic brand in Taiwan. 
 
Our product range as follows: 
AC Power: Electric Wire Rope Winch, Electric Chain Hoist 
DC Power: Off-Road Winch..ATV & UTV winch 
Battery Type: Battery Wire Rope Winch, Battery Chain Hoist 
We also provide OEM/ODM solutions for customizations.. 
 
With strict quality control, e...
more


























																	ELECTRIC MINI WIRE WINCH
																


 











																	ELECTROMAGNETISM
																


 











																	ELECTRIC MINI CHAIN HOIST
																


 











																	ELECTRIC INVERSION CHAIN HOIST
																


 











																	BATTERY BABY WINCH
																


 











																	BATTERY BABY CHAIN HOIST
																


 











																	COMPACT WINCH
																


 











																	ELECTRIC CHAIN HOIST
																


 












more









search







2014 INTERNATIONALE 
We sincerely invite you to vist us at BOOTH No.G-070


Ex... 


NEW PRODUCTS   
"NEW PRODUCTS"
 BATTERY BABY WINCH
MODEL:DCW-250... 

more 








			
TEL：+886-2-2267-7370   |   FAX：+886-2-2267-7380   |   E-MAIL：sales@duke-winch.com    |   SKYPE：dukewinch
Web： www.duke-winch.com   |  ADD： 6, TATUNG ST., TUCHENG DIST., NEW TAIPEI CITY 23679, TAIWAN   
    Copyright © 2009 CHI ZONG MACHINE CO., LTD.  |  The website requires the at least IE7 or below IE7
			
Web Design 







Use cookies This website uses cookies to deliver superior functionality and to enhance your experience. Continued use of this site indicates that you accept this policy.Serrano Ham from Spain: production areas, productions data, Spanish export companies, types of cured ham. | Foods from Spain.News  |Blogs  |Food Calendar  |Newsletter  
                      
                      
                    Wine  Spain & Regions  Doing Business  Chefs & Training  Products & Recipes  Shop, Travel & Dine  History  Foodpedia  Products & RecipesBackProductsRecipesBakery & Confectionery from SpainCheese from SpainChocolate from SpainSpanish Farmed FishSpanish Preserved FishOther Spanish FruitsSpanish CitrusSpanish Exotic FruitsSpanish Fruit PreservesHoney from SpainIbérico Pig Products from SpainJams & Fruit Pastes from SpainLegumes & Beans from SpainSpanish Fresh Meats & PoultrySpanish Preserved MeatNuts & Dried Fruits from SpainOlive Oil from SpainOlives & Pickles from SpainOrganic Products from SpainRice from SpainSauces from SpainSausages & Charcuterie from SpainSerrano Ham & Others from SpainSpices & Salt from SpainTurrón (Nougat) from SpainSpanish Preserved  Vegs & FruitsSpanish VegetablesVinegars from SpainWine from SpainWine Grapes from SpainPrintEmail   |RoutesProductsTagsIbérico ham Spanish Cheese Spanish Companies Spanish Grape Varieties Spanish ham Spanish Olive Oil Spanish Wine Spanish Wineries Plate with slices of serrano ham. Toya Legido/©ICEXSerrano Ham & OthersA Passion for Ham
Author: Santiago Botas/©ICEX.   If any one product could be singled out to represent the essence of Spanish gastronomy, it might well be cured ham, the noblest of pork products. Anyone coming to Spain for the first time will immediately be impressed by the omnipresence of ham, not only in practically all food stores and catering establishments but also in the subconscious of Spaniards, where it takes on an almost mythical nature. In the opinion of many, Spain tastes of ham.  Although it was the Romans who extended pig-farming in Spain, pigs were already important amongst the pre-Roman settlers, as evidenced by the large stone sculptures that roughly represent boars and that can be found in various inland spots of Spain. Both pigs and bulls were considered in pre-Roman cultures to be theogonic animals, that is, created by pagan gods. We have documentary proof that these territories were already known for their pig production prior to the Romans, in the third of Strabo's Geographic books (1st century BC), the one on Iberia. This is just an indication of the fact that references to pigs and ham have existed throughout history in Spanish art and literature.  Spain's longstanding tradition for curing hams and other meat products is the result of a combination of geographic, climatic, historical, cultural and even religious factors because the massive adoption of the pig was one of the many legacies of Roman civilization throughout Christendom. At that time, hams were already being covered with salt for a number of days then cured in mountain air, whence the term serrano, meaning "from the mountains". This term is a general one for cured ham but today is reserved for those made from white pigs (those from Ibérico pigs are called ibérico hams, not Serrano), especially the Duroc, Landrace and Large White breeds, that meet the requirements of the Traditional Speciality Guaranteed Jamón Serrano (TSG) label.  Ham Variety  Today, Spain has the largest figures worldwide for ham production and consumption. The proverbial need to stock up one's cupboards in case of hard times has been converted into a technique that has made ham production a powerful industry. Although many hams are still cured in the traditional, artisan way, the old, natural drying-chambers have largely been replaced by modern chillers that maintain the ideal temperature and humidity conditions throughout the process.  There are different levels of quality for cured ham depending on the origin of the fresh meat, the breed and diet of the pig, how it is tended and slaughtered, the skill and care of the producers and the duration of the whole process. The minimum curing period is seven months, but it may be much longer depending on the initial weight of the ham and other factors.  Some districts and towns have become renowned for the tradition and quality of their white pork cured hams and bear the corresponding quality seal - the hams from Teruel in Aragón (protected by PDO Jamón de Teruel), and Trévelez in the Alpujarra mountains in Granada, Andalusia, protected by PGI Jamón de Trévelez.  In view of their local characteristics, such hams should be known by their place of origin, for example, Jamón de Teruel and Jamón de Trevélez rather than using the general term "serrano" which is used exclusively for production following the TSG Jamón Serrano label regulations.  Flavor, Health and Passion  When cut, a good Serrano ham should have a shiny appearance, varying in color from pink to purplish red. The texture should be firm and not very fibrous, and the flavor intense, delicate, not very salty, smooth on the palate and with a very characteristic aroma.  Moreover, ham is rich in proteins, vitamins and minerals. Its fat content is moderate, with a predominance of unsaturated fats. The salt added during curing guarantees its microbiological safety, although new technologies have made it possible to greatly reduce the use of salt, achieving a healthier, more balanced product.  Spaniards are passionate about ham. It is consumed at any time of day or night and at every type of celebration. Sliced wafer-thin and served with good bread, it is the epitome of famous tapas. But it can be served in a multitude of ways - with fresh tomatoes, melon or other fruit, as a garnish for cold sups such as gazpacho and salmorejo or as an ingredient in salads and cooked dishes to which it always contributes its unmistakable personality.  List of food stores in Spain  List of food stores around the world

Select a product
Other Cured Hams & Shoulders- Jamón de Serón PGI- Jamón de Teruel PDO- Jamón de Trévelez  PGISerrano Ham & Shoulders- Jamón Serrano TSG- Jamón SerranoConsorcioRank of Spain in worldwide trade2nd (Source: Consorcio Serrano)Spanish Total Production
YearVolume (*)Value2015273,550 mTN.A.2014260,500 mTN.A.2013254,000 mTN.A.2012247,599 mTN.A.2011255,000 mTN.A.2010251,000 mTN.A.2009245,000 mTN.A.2008271,900 mTN.A.2007240,470 mTN.A.2006265,168 mTN.A.(*) estimated figures. Source: ANICE.
Spanish Export Share / Total Production (average for the last three years)
                                                15.3 % (Source: ANICE)
                                        Spanish Companies (approx. no.)1,704 (Source: Eurocarne)Spanish Exporters
Do you want to find Spanish Jamón Serrano export companies? Take a look at our Spanish companies search engine.
PrintEmail   |Stores & MarketsDespañaDelicias de EspañaDean & DelucaD'AgostinosCentral MarketFeinkost KäferCasa OliverEsteban Ruiz SpaintradeBristol FarmsTapas el QuijoteTapastaSpanish Harlem V.O.F.OlivasMe gustaLa VentaLa EspañolaIbérica/La EspañolaA Southern SeasonHollandaluzGransjean Wijnen & DelicatessenSeibu Department StoreGrantham's Fine Food And WineTokyu Department StorePusateri's Fine FoodsPrintemps GinzaPimentónPark Hyatt Tokyo DelicatessenGarcia & SonsRobFratelli Camisa LtdZabar'sWhole Foods MarketVillage MarketTrader Joe'sIsetan ShinjukuKitchen Garden (Oban) LtdDean & Deluca Japan Co. LtdSeijo Ishii (Tokyo Europe Trading Co., Ltd)Supermarket Den-En National Azabu GroupThe GardenNational Azabu SupermarketMeidi-Ya Co.Kinokuniya InternationalEmmett's Of PeasenhallThe Vinegar FactoryThe Spanish Table 4The Spanish Table 3The Spanish Table 2The Spanish Table 1The Garden of EdenThe Amish MarketOle Ole Foods IncOakville Grocery'sUrru Culinary StoreCooper Fine FoodsThe Gourmet ShopMorton'sWineandtapas.comEvergreenWeinmarkt KirchhellenMolto FormaggioEl GustoLatienda.comPapageno FeinkostLa Española Meats IncBon Bini ValenciaIngredients GourmetPacomer TraiteurIgourmet.comGuido Fresh MarketplaceCatalan GourmetHarvey Nichols Food MarketCavistons Food EmporiumPeckSol y VinoMolina GmbHLafayette GourmetKERO SchinkenlandKaufhofKadeweGourmet GarageFox & Obel Food MarketFairwayEthnic GrocerCarmen & LolaEli's ManhattanE.A.T.Food MuseumsCentro de Interpretación del Porcino (Pig Museum)Cooking SchoolsSuperior School for Ham CarvingBooksCharcutería. The Soul of SpainAbout Us 
                                |Privacy Policy 
                                |Legal Terms 
                                |Contact Us 
                                |RSS 
                                |Site Map 
                                             All Rights Reserved. ICEX © 2017 








Serrano Limited Company Profile | EMIS










 


















Close



Menu







Search




$0.00 (0)
Basket



Basket


 

 




 
 



Total


USD
$0.00


 

View basket
Checkout now
 

 






Industry Reports
Company Reports
M&A Reports



                                 
                            













 


 
 


















Home  Company reports search  Serrano Limited     







 


 Singapore                
Serrano Limited
An EMIS Company Report
EMIS is a Euromoney Institutional Investor plc company
USD 29.95

Industry: Furniture and Related Product Manufacturing
Available in: English
Format: PDF Download
Most recent financial data: 2016

Buy full report
 
 
 
 




What’s included?
This report extracts all available information about this company from EMIS' database of company information. The Table of Contents on the right indicates the categories of information that will be included in your report upon purchase.
Download a sample report






 


Company Tear Sheet                    
                        (locked content will be provided in the purchased report)
                    


Contact Information                    





Legal Address
                                49 Sungei Kadut Loop                                
                                Singapore;                                Singapore;                                Map 
                                                                    Postal Code: 729492                                                            

Tel: +65-6305-
Fax: +65-6367-




Email:
@serrano.com.sg                            

Website:
http://www.serrano.com.sg 



 

Company Description                    




                        Serrano Limited is engaged in providing interior fit-out solutions for residential, hospitality, retail and commercial sectors in Singapore and across Southeast Asia. The company's portfolio spans the residential, hospitality, retail and commercial sectors, with a focus on mid to high-end private residential developments.  Serrano Limited offers integrated kitchen systems and office systems, and living, dining and bedroom sets suitable for home, office and commercial use. The company is based in Singapore with an office in Thailand.
                    


NAICS Industry Classification                    


Basic Information                    


Key Executives                    


Ownership Details                    


Key Financial Highlights                    


Financial Performance Charts                    


Top Competitors                    

 

Financial Statements

Annual Statements                    


Ratios                    

 

EMIS Credit Analytics

EMIS Benchmark Score                    

 







 
 





What this report allows you to do
EMIS company reports provide the data you need to make accurate assessments about businesses you are interested in.




Identify sales opportunities

Does the company match your target demographic?
Who are the key executives?




Conduct risk assessment

Is the company creditworthy?
Is it financially stable?




Carry out strategic research

Is the company a potential business partner/investment opportunity?
What is its financial performance?


 
 
 
 


You’re in good company
EMIS company reports are used extensively by the world’s biggest companies, financial institutions, professional service companies and universities to assess businesses in emerging markets. 







800,000+
company profiles
We have information on both public and private companies across 125 countries.


2,000+
clients
EMIS is the go-to information source on emerging market companies for the world’s most prestigious businesses.

 
 
 
 

 









Enterprise ACCESS
If you need regular and ongoing access to company information, you should consider a subscription to the full EMIS service.
EMIS company profiles are part of a larger information service where that combines company, industry and country data and analysis for over 125 emerging markets on a unique information platform.
REQUEST A DEMO




 


Contact us to learn more about our business solutions.
 
 





FOLLOW US

B



 
 



Sign up to our newsletter
Make sure you’re not the last to know by getting the latest insights on emerging markets straight to your inbox.


Sign up

 
 


 
 
 















 





Serrano Pepper - Buy Serrano Pepper,Serrano Peppers,Pepper Product on Alibaba.com




























































































                    MENU
                




                            MENU
                        







Alibaba.com





                            Sourcing Solutions
                            




                            Services & Membership
                            




                            Help & Community
                            








                        One Request, Multiple Quotes




                        Get the App





















Advanced Search




















































Supplier:




Qingdao Liandahang Foods Co., Ltd.




















































                                                                        Home
                                                                        


>




                                        All Industries
                                                                            


>




                                        Food & Beverage
                                                                            


>




                                        Seasonings & Condiments
                                                                            


>




                                        Spices & Herbs Products
                                                                            


>




                                        Single Spices & Herbs
                                                                                    (114580)


































View larger image
        
















Add to Compare








Share
                                    












Serrano pepper





FOB Reference Price：Get Latest Price


US $800-2,000  / Metric Ton                                                                                                                                                | 1 Twenty-Foot Container 1*20' FCL (Min. Order)
                                                                                                                                                                                                                                    




                                Supply Ability:
                            

                                800 Metric Ton/Metric Tons per   Month                            



                                Port:
                            

                                Qingdao port, China                            






 Contact Supplier 




Loading...






















                                                                Product Details
                                                            
















                                    Report Suspicious Activity
                                









Overview



Quick Details



Product Type:


Single Herbs & Spices




Style:


Dried




Drying Process:


sundried, machine drying




Processing Type:


Raw




Certification:


BRC, FDA, GAP, HACCP, IMO, ISO, KOSHER, QS, HALAL




Shape:


Powder




Color:


red




Place of Origin:


Shandong, China (Mainland)




Weight (kg):


10




Shelf Life:


2 years at -18°C.




Brand Name:


Liandahang




Model Number:


hot chili pepper powder & PAPRIKA POWDER




Type:


Paprika




Form:


Whole, Crushed, Powdered




Paprika ASTA:


100-120-140-160-180-200-220




Part:


Seed & Seedless, Stem & Stemless




Cayenne Pepper SHU:


25,000-35,000-40,000-60,000-70,000




Chili Pepper SHU:


100-1,000-5,000-10,000-15,000-20,000




Mesh Size:


5-25, 40-120




Hot Red Chilli Paste Types:


about 20 types




Sterilizing:


Microwave





Packaging & Delivery


Packaging Details:
Inner package: 5lbs/sealed poly bag.
outer package: 25lbs/kraft paper bag, Carton box or according to the clients requirments.


Delivery Detail:
within 3 weeks/40' FCL after prepayment is into account










Our factory is located at the center of China biggest chilies collecting and distributing, near the Production areas of many chilies, as leading Agricultural Plantation, Manufacturer & Exporter Company in Jiaozhou City, China, and specialize in producing Chili produces. If you really want to cooperate with our foods factory, please call us by phone and also send an email, such we will send you the best offer price requested. If you have a long plan to purchase chili produces, we will sign contract to support your business. Welcome to visit our factory personally in Jiaozhou city, Qindao, China.  Our Chili details:   The newest crop Available Materials Chili Wholefrom China Origin SHU / ASTA Length & Size1. Sweet PaprikaSimilar in Shape:New Mexico ChileAnaheim PepperCalifornia ChileH.S. CODE: 0904.2010.00Taste: SweetASTA:100-22050-200SHU (Super Red)100-500SHUHotness Scale: 0-210cm and upLoose Seeds: Below 2%Broken: Below 3%.Type: Stem & Stem less(SAME AS Below-mentioned)2. Yidu Chili ( Costeno Chile ) H.S.CODE: 0904.2100.00Mild500-1000SHU5000-8000SHU60-180ASTAHotness Scale: 2-4/ 65-7cm, 7cm and up, 10cm and up3. Xi An chiliCrapy ChiliThread ChiliWrinkled Chill Similar in shape: Byadgi ChiliH.S.CODE: 0904.2100.00Mild500-1000SHU100-140ASTAHotness Scale: 1-3 12000-17000 SHUHotness Scale: 6-75-10cm, 12cm and up4. Big & Small    Jintiao Chili H.S.CODE: 0904.2100.00MILD1000-2000SHU2500-3000SHUHotness Scale: 3-55-10cm, 12cm and up.5. Beijing Red Chili H.S.CODE: 0904.2100.00MILD2000-5000SHUHotness Scale: 4-55-7cm7cm and up10cm and up6. Jalapeños ChiliH.S.CODE: 0904.2100.00Mild, 2,500-9,000Hotness Scale: 3-62”-2 ½”5-7cm7. American Red Chili    Guajillo Chili  H.S.CODE: 0904.2100.00MEDIUM HOT3000SHUHotness Scale: 5-715,000-20,000SHU60-120ASTA  7cm and up, 7-15cm8. Jinta ChiliSimilar in Shape: Chili Puya,H.S.CODE: 0904.2100.00HOT10000-15,000SHU100-160ASTA5000-10000SHUHotness Scale: 6-75-12cm, 12cm and up9. Yunnan Chili CayenneSimilar in shape:Arbol ChileThai, or Bird chiliH.S.CODE: 0904.2100.00CAYENNE MILD15,000-30,000SHU Hotness Scale:78cm and up, 12cm and up10.Hebei Chili cayenneTianjin ChiliTien Tsin chiliChaotian Chili Japanese ChiliTianying ChiliH.S.CODE: 0904.2100.00CAYENNE MILD/HOT30,000-35,000SHUHotness Scale: 8-960-120ASTA    3-5cm, 5-7cm.11.Bullet Chili CayenneH.S.CODE: 0904.2100.00CAYENNE MEDIUM35000-40000SHU60-120ASTA 3-6cm12.Tianyu Chili CayenneSimilar: Bird EyesH.S.CODE: 0904.2100.00CAYENNE MEDIUM40000-50000SHU60-120ASTA 3-6cm 13. Shanying Chili Cayenne  CAYENNE HOT 72000SHU, Hotness Scale: 9. 3-6cm14. Naga Bhut JolokiaOven dried Bhut Jolokia Oven or Smoked driedH.S.CODE: 0904.2100.00800,000-1,041,000SHUHotness Scale: 10 15. Natural PureChili Powder & Sweet Paprika Powder & Crushed Form: without seeds without stems.H.S CODE: 0904.2020.00100-120-140-160-180-200-220ASTA1,500-5,000-30,000-60,000SHUPowder Mesh Size: 40-60-80-100-120Crush Mesh Size: 5-25.For clients’ choice.16. Kimchi Red Pepper PowderFine & CoarseH.S CODE: 0904.2020.00 5,000-8,000 SHU Fine & Coarse.17. Roasted Chili Products      Smoked GuProducing capacity: 1200-1800kg per hour.Roasted Chili WholeRoasted Paprika Powder18. Hot Chili PasteH.S CODE: 200190.09Premium Quality HOT Chili Paste & Sauce.  about 20 Varieties. CertificateFDA, HACCP, GAP, KOSHER, MUI HALAL, BRC, ISO, ETC   Our Main Market & Key Customers1. Asia: Japan, Korea, Southeast Asia, Turkey, Kuwait, Iran, Cyprus, Qatar, Dubai (UAE.), Sri Lanka and Middle-East Region.2. EU: Germany, UK, Russia, Ukraine, Latvia, Bulgaria, Portugal, Spain, France, Greece, Italy, Sweden, Turkey, Albania, Hungary3. America: USA, Canada, Chile, Mexico4. Oceania: Australia,5. Africa: South Africa, Sudan, Mauritius.Mild Whole Chili Packing & Quantity:Bags:12MT/ 20FCL, 26MTs/ 40FCL for press bale package12MT/40’FCL---woven bag non pressed package24MT/40’FCL---vacuum packageCarton:15.672MT/40’FCL-25LBS/carton package.Cayenne Chili Packing:(a) 24kgs bag inner 3*8kgs vacuum bag.25MT can be loaded in 1*40’FCL container.(b) 30lbs carton inner 6*5lbs vacuum bag.23MT can be loaded in 1*40’FCL container.Chili Powder & crushed Packing:25 Kg/50lb in HDPE Laminated Paper Bags with liner Quantity: 16-18MT/20’ FCL.Packed & transported: under hygienic conditions.Scientifically graded, hygienically ground.Shelf life: 2 years at -18°C.Delivery time: PromptPayment: T/T Advance, L/C at sight, Western Union, Escrow.Supply capacity: 5000MT/monthPrice Terms: EXW, FOB, CFR, CIFWe have to Sell after Signing Sales Contract with Buyers.   Our Produces Show at Intenational Exhibition:  Our Foods Factory & Office Photos:Our Chili Cultivate Area &  Factory Yard:Our Chili Planting Base:  Our Chili Sun drying Area: Our Chili Produces Pictures:  Our Paprika & Chili Powder Packing:  Our Various Chili paste & Chili leisure Foods:  Conventional Terms of payment:1. After sales confirmation signed, 50% T/T repaid, B/L is released as soon as the remainder 50% T/T paid is into our account.2. After sales confirmation signed, 40% T/T repaid, the remainder 60% is paid against Irrevocable and confirmed L/C at sight. Price terms: FOB, CFR and CIF. Delivery time: Within 2 weeks/40' FCL after signing Sales Contract & prepayment arrives. Shipment port: Qingdao port, China. Inspection Certificate:FDA Certificate, Fumigation/Disinfection Certificate, Certificate of Origin, Phytosanitary Certificate and Inspection Certificate of Quantity & Quality. Contact person: Ms. Vera Wei. 















You May Like




Not exactly what you want? 1 request, multiple quotations Get Quotations Now >>




You May Like




Related Searches:


Serrano pepper
black pepper
salt and pepper grinder set


pepper grinder
black pepper buyers
pepper spray


salt and pepper grinder








China  :


China dr pepper
China habaneros peppers
China black pepper wholesale


China black pepper
China black pepper kerala
China black pepper importers


China chili pepper
China black pepper cloves
China black pepper vietnam price














You May Like








11
YRS


Qingdao Liandahang Foods Co., Ltd.




China (Mainland)
|
Manufacturer, Trading Company


Supplier Assessments:










Visit Minisite


Contact Detail








The supplier supports Trade Assurance – A free service that protects your orders from payment to delivery.Supplier's Trade Assurance Limit:  US $58,000Learn More




























 



























   Serrano, Serrano Suppliers and Manufacturers at Alibaba.com                                            



                     MENU      MENU         Alibaba.com      Sourcing Solutions      Services & Membership      Help & Community          One Request, Multiple Quotes     Get the App                      Advanced Search     Related Searches for serrano:   serrano pepper serrano italy wholesale serrano chile powder organic ham serrano spanish ham serrano pepper serrano serrano chili ham serrano cured dried serrano jamon serrano jamon serrano ham More...                                                       Home    >    Food & Beverage    >     serrano     > 184 Results             Filter               Advanced Search      Related Searches:           Related Categories:  Food & Beverage      Ham Canned Vegetables Sausage Fresh Garlic Sauce Fish Other Food & Beverage Single Spices & Herbs      Home & Garden      Storage Holders & Racks Pet Food         Supplier Location:      Sort By :  Relevancy Transaction Level Response Rate                 You may want to search:     turron                           Add to Compare      Response Rate:  83.3%      Contact Supplier     Tags: Spanish Ham | Jamon | Ham | View larger image        Spanish ham Jamon serrano cured in Teruel - Embutidos Bernal       EUR 6.62-6.63  / Kilogram   10 Kilograms (Min. Order)    Instrumentacion y Componentes S.A.                          Add to Compare         Contact Supplier     Tags: Serrano Ham | View larger image        Brazilian Ham. "Serrano"       US $600-800  / Metric Ton   54 Metric Tons (Min. Order)    STARFLEX COMERCIO DE MAQUINAS E EQUIPAMENTOS LTDA                          Add to Compare      Response Rate:  0.0%      Contact Supplier     Tags: Cinzento Serrano | Cinzento Serrano Granite | Cinzento Serrano Stone | View larger image        Cinzento Serrano       US $6.84-408.33  / Square Meter   1 Square Meter (Min. Order)    Fujian Nanan Zonsen Stone Co., Ltd.                          Add to Compare         Contact Supplier     Tags: Ham Cured Serrano And Iberico | Iberian Ham | View larger image        Ham Cured Serrano And Iberico      1 Unit (Min. Order)    Shanghai Hansen Global Supply Co., Ltd.                          Add to Compare         Contact Supplier     Tags: Spain Ham | View larger image        Spanish Ham. "Serrano"       EUR 5-10  / Kilogram   1 Kilogram (Min. Order)    Mediterranean Meat Point SL                           Add to Compare         Contact Supplier     Tags: Chilies | View larger image        Chile Serrano       Luvermex                          Add to Compare         Contact Supplier     Tags: Ham For Serrano R.o.p. | View larger image        Best Quality Ham for serrano R.O.P.       US $600-800  / Metric Ton   54 Metric Tons (Min. Order)    STARFLEX COMERCIO DE MAQUINAS E EQUIPAMENTOS LTDA                          Add to Compare         Contact Supplier     Tags: Serrano Chiles | Pickle Chiles | Serrano Peppers | View larger image        Pickled Serrano Chiles      1 Twenty-Foot Container (Min. Order)    MIFCO MEXICO SA DE CV                          Add to Compare         Contact Supplier     Tags: Pickled Jalapeno Pepper | View larger image        Pickled Serrano Chiles      100 Cartons (Min. Order)    Mecton International Foods Co LLC                          Add to Compare         Contact Supplier     Tags: Spanish Ham Serrano | View larger image        spanish ham serrano       EUR 50-400    5 Pieces (Min. Order)    instanbuy                           Add to Compare         Contact Supplier     Tags: Granite Red | View larger image        Granite Red Serrano       US $60-75    1000 Meters (Min. Order)    Rhoda granito y marmol                          Add to Compare         Contact Supplier     Tags: Christmas Birth | View larger image        Christmas birth - serrano      12 Sets (Min. Order)    IMAGINART PERU E I R L                          Add to Compare         Contact Supplier     Tags: Health Food | View larger image        Terma Serrano       Cepas Argentinas                          Add to Compare         Contact Supplier          Spanish Ham - Jamon Serrano      15 Units (Min. Order)    Raposos LLC                          Add to Compare      Response Rate:  45.8%    Transaction Level:          Contact Supplier     Tags: Keychian | He Photo Spinner Keychian With Puerta De Serranos | He Photo Spinner Keychian With Puerta De Serrano | View larger image        The Photo Spinner Keychian With puerta de serranos For Valencia Souvenirs       US $0.4-0.9  / Piece   1 Piece (Min. Order)    Yiwu Lifeng Arts & Crafts Co., Ltd.                           Add to Compare         Contact Supplier     Tags: Serrano | View larger image        Cafe Serrano       Liniera agroindustrial LA, srl                          Add to Compare      Response Rate:  19.5%    Transaction Level:         Contact Supplier     Tags: Promotional Serrano Grip Click Pen | Customized Serrano Grip Click Pen | Promotional Plastic Click Pens | View larger image        Customized Serrano Grip Click Pen (T092043) Promotional Plastic Click Pens       US $0.05-0.165  / Piece   2500 Pieces (Min. Order)    Tonglu Lulu Imp.& Exp. Co., Ltd.                          Add to Compare      Response Rate:  64.3%    Transaction Level:        Contact Supplier     Tags: Ham Stand Ham Holder | Prosciutto Ham Holder | Wooden Ham Holder Prosciutto Ham Holder | View larger image        FDA LFGB SGS pine wooden spanish serrano ham stand rack prosciutto ham holder with ham knives manufacture       US $3.3-3.3  / Pieces   1000 Pieces (Min. Order)    Yangjiang Weiwei Global Industrial Co., Ltd.                          Add to Compare      Response Rate:  62.5%    Transaction Level:          Contact Supplier     Tags: Serrano Pen | Advertising Serrano Pen | View larger image        Advertising Serrano Pen       US $0.13-0.67  / Piece   100 Pieces (Min. Order)    Fuzhou Dachion Import&Export Co., Ltd.                          Add to Compare      Response Rate:  91.1%    Transaction Level:        Contact Supplier     Tags: Serrano Pepper | View larger image        hot sale & high quality Serrano pepper With Trade Assurance       US $3.1-3.1  / Kilogram   100 Kilograms (Min. Order)    Yunnan East Garden Trading Co., Ltd.                           Add to Compare         Contact Supplier     Tags: Ham Prosciutto | Prosciutto Spagnolo | View larger image        Jamon Serrano Bodega "de JABUGO" - serrano ham "cellar"- Spanish ham       EUR 5.95-7.30  / Kilogram   500 Kilograms (Min. Order)    BIG SARDINIA S.R.L.S.                          Add to Compare         Contact Supplier     Tags: Serrano Chorizo Ham Jamon | View larger image        SALAMI, SALCHICHON, CHORIZO, SERRANO HAM, FUET, LONGANIZA       EUR 4.7-5  / Kilogram   1000 Kilograms (Min. Order)    HERMANOS FONT VERDAGUER S.A.                          Add to Compare         Contact Supplier     Tags: Ham Serrano Photo | View larger image        Reliable and High quality ham serrano photo Fibrous casings with multiple functions made in Japan       US $0.35-0.8  / Meter   1 Meter (Min. Order)    FUTAMURA CHEMICAL CO.,LTD.                          Add to Compare         Contact Supplier     Tags: Serrano Ham Holder | Beef Ham | Sausage In Bulk | View larger image        Quality Spanish Serrano HAM & Ham Iberico, Sausages       US $6.25-7.25  / Kilogram   100 Kilograms (Min. Order)    FIRE WOOD SRLS                          Add to Compare      Response Rate:  77.6%    Transaction Level:          Contact Supplier     Tags: Serrano Jamon Holder | Jamon Holder | Serrano Jamon | View larger image        50% off high quality wooden spanish serrano jamon holder       US $1-10  / Set   500 Sets (Min. Order)    Fuzhou Riches Home & Garden Co., Ltd.                           Add to Compare         Contact Supplier     Tags: Sauce | View larger image        SERRANO CHILI SAUCE       INDUSTRIAS IZEL S DE RL DE CV                          Add to Compare         Contact Supplier     Tags: Canned Serrano Hot Sliced Diced Chili Mexican Mexico | View larger image        Canned Serrano Pepper      1 Pallet (Min. Order)    LC Trade                          Add to Compare         Contact Supplier     Tags: Bones For Dogs | View larger image        Serrano Ham Bones       EUR 1-2  / Piece   800 Pieces (Min. Order)    Eltedex                          Add to Compare      Response Rate:  96.9%    Transaction Level:         Contact Supplier     Tags: Chiles Serranos Drying Machine Dl-6chz | View larger image        Time saving CHILES SERRANOS drying machine DL-6CHZ factory       US $100-1000  / Set   1 Set (Min. Order)    Quanzhou Deli Agroforestrial Machinery Co., Ltd.                          Add to Compare      Response Rate:  46.7%    Transaction Level:        Contact Supplier     Tags: Serrano Wooden Coffee Table | Simple Round Coffee Table | Wooden Coffee Tables | View larger image        Serrano Wooden Coffee Table,Simple Round coffee table      10 Pieces (Min. Order)    NINGBO TR FURNISHING IMP&EXP CO., LTD.                           Add to Compare      Response Rate:  43.5%      Contact Supplier     Tags: Verde Serrano Marble | Verde Antico Marble | Verde Alpi Marble | View larger image        Verde Serrano Marble       US $7-50  / Square Meter   100 Square Meters (Min. Order)    Xiamen Ninesun Stone Ind. Co., Ltd.                          Add to Compare         Contact Supplier     Tags: Golf | View larger image        Aldila Serrano Hybrid Graphite      1 Unit (Min. Order)    HIREKO TRADING COMPANY INC.                          Add to Compare         Contact Supplier     Tags: Pepper | View larger image        Serrano pepper       US $800-2000  / Metric Ton   1 Twenty-Foot Container (Min. Order)    Qingdao Liandahang Foods Co., Ltd.                          Add to Compare         Contact Supplier          "serrano" Ham Spanish       EUR 60-300    2 Pieces (Min. Order)    Iberico Internacional                          Add to Compare      Response Rate:  53.3%    Transaction Level:         Contact Supplier     Tags: Ham And Stand | Serrano Ham And Stand | View larger image        high quality low price wooden serrano ham and stand       US $2-8  / Set   1000 Sets (Min. Order)    Jenwood Arts & Crafts Co., Ltd.                           Add to Compare      Response Rate:  100%      Contact Supplier     Tags: Serrano Side Steepening Board | Running Boards For Toyota | Running Boards For Ssangyong | View larger image        serrano side steepening board       US $180-360  / Set   10 Sets (Min. Order)    Shanghai Canglu Auto Parts Co., Ltd.                          Add to Compare         Contact Supplier     Tags: Food | View larger image        Garibaldi Refried beans with corn and serrano peppers      144 Packs (Min. Order)    Latinflavor sa de cv                          Add to Compare      Response Rate:  22.7%    Transaction Level:         Contact Supplier     Tags: Hot Selling Serrano Side Steepening Board | Serrano Side Steepening Board With Low Price | View larger image        Hot selling serrano side steepening board with low price for toyota for RAV4       US $20-100  / Set   10 Sets (Min. Order)    Jiangsu Junruida Auto Accessories Co., Ltd.                          Add to Compare      Response Rate:  73.9%      Contact Supplier     Tags: Hector Serrano Pendant Lamp | View larger image        Best design hector serrano pendant lamp      10 Pieces (Min. Order)    Zhongshan C5 Lighting Factory                          Add to Compare         Contact Supplier     Tags: Spanish Boneless Serrano Ham | Import Ham | View larger image        Spanish Boneless Serrano Ham      1 Unit (Min. Order)    Shanghai Hansen Global Supply Co., Ltd.                           Add to Compare         Contact Supplier     Tags: Belt Drying Machine | Fruit Belt Dryer | Vegetable Belt Dryer | View larger image        CHILES SERRANOS mesh belt dryer       US $15000-20000  / Set   1 Set (Min. Order)    Jiangsu Shengman Drying Equipment Engineering Co., Ltd.                          Add to Compare       Transaction Level:        Contact Supplier     Tags: Chiles Serranos Drying Machine | Continuous Type Drying Machine | Foodstuff Drier | View larger image        CHILES SERRANOS mesh belt dryer       US $5000-300000  / Set   1 Set (Min. Order)    Changzhou Yibu Drying Equipment Co., Ltd.               Go to Page     Prev 1 2 3 4 5 ... 5 Next            Food & Beverage  >  Meat & Poultry  >  Meat Product  >  Ham             Buying Request Hub   Haven't found the right supplier yet ? Let matching verified suppliers find you.  Get Quotation NowFREE       Do you want to show serrano or other products of your own company? Display your Products FREE now!             Related Category        Food & Beverage     Ham (22)   Canned Vegetables (4)   Sausage (1)   Fresh Garlic (1)   Sauce (6)    Fish (2)   Other Food & Beverage (5)   Single Spices & Herbs (4)   See more    Home & Garden     Storage Holders & Racks (12)   Pet Food (1)     Other Category     General Trade Agents (19)   Granite (7)   Ballpoint Pens (3)   Metal Crafts (2)   Tray Dryer (1)    Fruit & Vegetable Processing Machines (1)   Marble (3)   Dining Chairs (1)   See more            Product Features        Type        Pimiento (2)        Ballpoint Pen (3)        Garlic (1)        Ham (4)         Paprika (1)      See more      Certification        BRC (3)        ISO (17)        IFS (7)        HACCP (11)         FDA (5)        CE / EU (11)      See more      Packaging        Vacuum Pack (14)        Can (Tinned) (5)        Bag (2)         Material        Wood (17)        Plastic (3)        Metal (3)        Bamboo (5)         Crystal (3)      See more      Style        Canned (4)        Preserved (3)        Fresh (9)        Dried (1)         Use        Promotional Pen (3)        Souvenir (3)           Minimum Order:  OK          Supplier Features        Supplier by Area        Asia (82)        Europe (16)        Middle East (1)        North America (6)        South America (14)         Suppliers by Country/Region        China (Mainland)         Liaoning (1)        Shandong (8)        Guangdong (12)        Yunnan (1)        Fujian (12)        Jiangsu (4)        Zhejiang (5)          Spain (12)        Italy (4)        United Arab Emirates (1)        Mexico (1)        Argentina (7)        Pakistan (5)        Japan (4)        Brazil (6)        United States (5)        Dominican Republic (1)        Bangladesh (1)            Supplier Types        Trade Assurance        Gold Supplier             Onsite Checked(Advanced)   A&V Checked(Basic)         Assessed Supplier        Transactions via Alibaba.com             Top 3 Markets        North America (54)        Western Europe (43)        South America (40)        Eastern Europe (34)         Southern Europe (26)        Eastern Asia (23)        Central America (20)        Northern Europe (20)        Southeast Asia (18)        Mid East (15)        Domestic Market (11)        South Asia (8)        Oceania (5)        Africa (3)      See more      Total Revenue        US$10 Million - US$50 Million (19)        Below US$1 Million (17)        US$5 Million - US$10 Million (16)        Above US$100 Million (15)         US$1 Million - US$2.5 Million (14)        US$2.5 Million - US$5 Million (5)        US$50 Million - US$100 Million (1)      See more      Mgnt Certification        Other (29)        ISO9001 (11)        HACCP (7)        ISO14001 (6)         FSC (4)        ISO22000 (4)        OHSAS18001 (1)      See more          Recommendation for you                                               ensearchweb010176175037        






Serrano Imports - Home

























































Spanish Charcuterie



 


Fuente 18-Month Gran Reserva Boneless Serrano
New! Contact us for more details. See more




 


Fuente 18-Month Gran Reserva  Bone-In Serrano
New! Contact us for more details. See more





 


Fermín 24-Month Bone-In Serrano
Ready to carve and elegant to serve, this Serrano is carefully prepared like the boneless variety, imbuing the meat and swirling... See more




 


Fermín 24-Month Boneless Serrano
Uniquely made from pork raised in the town of La Alberca, near Salamanca, this authentic and traditional Spanish mountain... See more





 


Fermin Pre-Sliced 24-Month Serrano
The traditional and full-flavoured Spanish Serrano ham that you buy at the deli is now available in a grab and go pre-sliced... See more




 


Fermín 24-Month Bone-In Ibérico
Made from the native cerdo Iberico black-footed pigs, they are fed on a diet of high-quality grain. Cured for 24 months,... See more





 


Fermín 24-Month Boneless Ibérico
Made from the native cerdo Iberico black-footed pigs, they are fed on a diet of high-quality grain. Cured for 24 months,... See more




 


Fermín Pre-Sliced 24-Month Ibérico
Now you can enjoy the traditional, full flavour of legendary Ibérico ham in a convenient grab-and-go pre-sliced package. See more





 


Fermín 36-Month Bone-In Ibérico De Bellota
Jamon Iberico de Bellota is the ULTIMATE of its kind. Compared to Beluga caviar or Kobe beef, this gourmet Spanish ham is... See more




 


Fermín 36-Month Boneless Ibérico De Bellota
Jamon Iberico de Bellota is the ULTIMATE of its kind. Compared to Beluga caviar or Kobe beef, this gourmet Spanish ham is... See more





 


Fermín Lomo Ibérico de Bellota
The loin of the acorn-fed free range Spanish Iberico de Bellota black-footed pig. This product has incredible swirling of... See more




 


Fermín Chorizo Ibérico, Extra Thick
Like its daintier variety, this hefty chorizo is made from 100% Ibérico pork and seasoned with Spanish smoked paprika, giving... See more





 


Fermín Salchichon Ibérico, Extra Thick
A larger, full-flavoured sausage made with 100% Ibérico pork and spiced with black pepper. A wonderful addition to your... See more




 


Palacios Dry-Cured Chorizo – Hot
Seasoned with picante smoked paprika from western Spain, this chorizo is spicy but not flaming hot like its Mexican cousin.... See more





 


Palacios Dry-Cured Chorizo – Mild
Seasoned with sweet smoked paprika, this traditional chorizo imparts a distinctively mild flavour. Authentically Spanish,... See more




 


Fermín Lomo Ibérico
A tender loin of the rare Iberico black-footed pig rubbed with smoky paprika and cured three months to produce a full deep... See more





 


Fermín Iberico Morcon Salami
A compact deli case size of bold Ibérico chorizo, this cured sausage is made from mouthwatering Ibérico pork and thoroughly... See more




 


Fermín Chorizo Ibérico, Longaniza
This dry-cured sausage, made from 100% famous Ibérico pork, is carefully seasoned with Spanish smoked paprika – giving... See more





 


Fermín Salchichon Ibérico, Longaniza
This melt-in-your-mouth sausage is made from the same 100% Ibérico pork as the chorizo but, instead of paprika, it’s seasoned... See more




Accessories



 


Fish Grilling Basket
NEW! Contact us for more details. Available in 2 sizes (38 x 20 cm, 61 x 32 cm). See more




 


Paella Pan Polished Induction (30 cm)
Now you can make your paella at home with this traditional paella pan, with a thicker base and adapted to cook in your induction... See more





 


Cast Iron Griddle Round (32 cm)
Cookware made of cast iron, with two handles that do not transmit the heat. These plates have two faces, one grooved for... See more




 


Pata Negra Double-Gauge Steel Paella Pan (38 cm enamelled)
This durable crafted enamelled pan is made from double-gauge steel, which helps evenly distribute the heat during cooking... See more





 


Pata Negra Double-Gauge Steel Paella Pan (38 cm)
This durable crafted pan is made from double-gauge steel, which helps evenly distribute the heat during cooking and prevents... See more




 


Traditional Steel Paella Pan (50 cm)
This traditional steel paella pan is the most commonly used in Spain. Crafted from hammered carbon steel, it’s imprinted... See more





 


Traditional Steel Paella Pan (36 cm)
This traditional steel paella pan is the most commonly used in Spain. Crafted from hammered carbon steel, it’s imprinted... See more




 


Paella Spoons (set of 5)
Perfect for mixing ingredients across your paella pan and for serving when you’re done cooking, this steel spoon has a... See more





 


Paella Table Guard
Avoid damage to your table top from your hot paella pan with this quality table guard. See more




 


Aluminum Paella Pan Lid
This lightweight, 32-cm across (12.5-in) paella lid is perfect for full coverage of your 30-cm (12-in) pan. See more





 


Mini Paella Tapas Pans
This set of four 15-cm across (6-in) mini black enamel paella pans are perfect for serving appetizers and are completely... See more




 


Pata Negra Double-Gauge Steel Paella Pan (30 cm)
This durable crafted pan is made from double-gauge steel, which helps evenly distribute the heat during cooking and prevents... See more





 


Traditional Steel Paella Pan (30 cm)
This traditional paella pan is the most commonly used in Spain. Crafted from hammered carbon steel, it’s imprinted with... See more




 


Medium Paella Grill System with Burner
Cook your paella the way it was meant to – outdoors over an open flame. This quality grill system with removable grill,... See more





 


Michelangelo Jamón Knife
Cutting ham very thin can be a challenge but this revolutionary knife makes it easy to carve like an expert – even for... See more




 


Black Hoof Ham Holder
Ideal for carving and storing your black-hoof Jamón Ibérico or any quality ham. Constructed with a solid wood base and... See more





 


Premium Stone or Wood Ham Holder
This polished stone or wood-based deluxe holder offers maximum stability, as well as a solid metal grip with adjustable angles... See more




 


Basic Ham Holder
Essential for carving and storing your bone-in ham, this basic but fully functional quality holder is constructed of wood... See more





Conservas: Spanish Canned Seafood



 


Don Bocarte Anchovy Fillets in Olive Oil 68/70 Count (550g)
Spanish canned seafood (known as conservas) is a favourite in bars and restaurants across Spain. Fished from the Bay of Biscay... See more




 


Don Bocarte Anchovy Fillets in Olive Oil 90/92 Count (550g)
Spanish canned seafood (known as conservas) is a favourite in bars and restaurants across Spain. Don Bocarte Anchovies are... See more





 


Don Bocarte Anchovy Fillets in Olive Oil 14/16 Count (120g)
Spanish canned seafood (known as conservas) is a favourite in bars and restaurants across Spain. Don Bocarte Anchovy are... See more




 


Don Bocarte Anchovy Fillets in Olive Oil 6/8 Count (48g)
Spanish canned seafood (known as conservas) is a favourite in bars and restaurants across Spain. Don Bocarte anchovy are... See more





 


Conservas de Cambados Cuttlefish (Tinta de Calamar) Ink
Cuttlefish ink is widely used in Spain for a variety of dishes including paella, pasta and sauce. Conservas de Cambados uses... See more




 


Conservas de Cambados Octopus (Pulpo) in Olive Oil
Spanish canned seafood (known as conservas) is a favourite in bars and restaurants across Spain. When harvesting Octopus... See more





 


Conservas de Cambados Small Sardines (Sardinillas) in Olive Oil
Spanish canned seafood (known as conservas) is a favourite in bars and restaurants in Spain. Conservas de Cambados Small... See more




 


Conservas de Cambados Small Scallops (Zamburinas) in Galician Sauce
Spanish canned seafood (known as conservas) is a favourite in bars and restaurants across Spain. Conservas de Cambados gourmet... See more





 


Conservas de Cambados Squid (Chipirones) in Ink
Spanish canned squid is a favourite in bars and restaurants across Spain. This Squid (Chipirones) is harvested off the Galician... See more




 


Conservas de Cambados Razor Clams (Navajas) in Brine (266g)
Spanish canned seafood (known as conservas) is a favourite in bars and restaurants across Spain. Fished off the Galician... See more





 


Conservas de Cambados Razor Clams (Navajas) in Brine (111g)
Spanish canned seafood (known as conservas) is a favourite in bars and restaurants across Spain. Fished off the Galician... See more




 


Conservas de Cambados Mussels (Mejillones) from Galicia in Escabeche
Spanish canned seafood (known as conservas) is a favourite in bars and restaurants across Spain. Conservas de Cambados gourmet... See more





 


Conservas de Cambados Cockles (Berberechos) from Galicia in Brine (20/30)
Spanish canned seafood (known as conservas) is a favourite in bars and restaurants across Spain. From the Galician Rias Gallegas,... See more




 


Conservas de Cambados Squid (Chipirones) in Olive Oil
Spanish canned seafood (known as conservas) is a favourite in bars and restaurants across Spain. Conservas de Cambados Squid... See more





 


Conservas de Cambados Clams (Almejas Blancas) from Galicia in Brine
Spanish canned seafood (known as conservas) is a favourite in bars and restaurants across Spain. Harvested and handpicked... See more




 


Conservas de Cambados Cockles (Berberechos) from Galicia in Brine (20/25)
Spanish canned seafood (known as conservas) is a favourite in bars and restaurants across Spain. From the Galician Rias Gallegas,... See more





 


Conservas de Cambados White Tuna Belly (Ventresca de Bonito) Fillets in Olive Oil
Spanish canned seafood (known as conservas) is a favourite in bars and restaurants across Spain. Gourmet Spanish white tuna... See more




Fresh Meats



 


Fermin Dressed Iberico Suckling Pig
Fermin Dressed Iberico Suckling Pig is the perfect showpiece for any party, dinner or event. This whole suckling pig can... See more




 


Fermín Pluma Ibérico (Loin Tip/Flank)
Derived from the more fatty – and flavourful — shoulder section of the loin, this cut takes its name from its feathered... See more





 


Fermín Presa Ibérico (Shoulder Steak)
Taken from the leanest part of the collar – the central part of the neck muscle – Presa stands out for its flavour and... See more




 


Fermín Secreto Ibérico (Boneless Shoulder)
Securing this ‘secret’ treasured cut of veined meat to ensure the right amount of fat is no easy task – it takes the... See more





 


Fermín Solomillo Ibérico (Tenderloin)
Ibérico stands out for its incredible rich flavour, texture and tenderness – and perhaps no cut stands out more than Solomillo.... See more




 


Fermín Chuletero Ibérico (Bone-In Loin)
Found along the pig’s back from shoulder to hip, composed of the loin, third part of the rib and backbone, the chuletero... See more





 


Fermín Costilla Ibérico (Spare Ribs)
Found in the thoracic cavity, there are two costillas per animal. Highly marbled and infused with acorn-rich flavour, the... See more




 


Fermín Panceta Ibérico (Belly Skin-On)
Made from the same belly meat as Italian-style pancetta, this cut is fatty and scrumptious with meat veins throughout. See more





 


Fermín Lomo Ibérico (Loin)
Valued both fresh and dry cured, the loin is a cut that’s always extremely juicy and packed with flavour. See more




 


Fermín Carrilleras Ibérico (Cheeks)
Tender and brimming with sweet fatty flavour, cheek meat is derived from around the jaw and is ideal for cooking. Serve it... See more





 


Fermín Cabecero de Lomo Ibérico (Collar)
This highly prized juicy fresh cut of pork, is similar to pork tenderloin but with more marbling. The blend between meat... See more




 


Fermín Tocino Ibérico (Back Fat Skin-On)
There’s no actual meat in tocino, highest quality and most flavourful Ibérico back fat – or lard – available. Golden... See more





 


Fermin Iberico Ham (Boneless)
This product is rich in golden, acorn-flavoured fat that is high in unsaturated healthy oils. One of the finest hams; starts... See more




Savoury



 


Cefran Spanish Saffron from La Mancha DOP
NEW! Spanish Saffron, known to be of the highest quality in the world, is derived from the dried stigmas of the Saffron flower... See more




 


Fuente Bomba Rice
Commonly referred to as the  “King of Rice”, Bomba is considered the best rice in the world by Spanish chefs.... See more





 


Piquillo Peppers de Pueblo – Glass Jars
Intense in colour and sweet with a slightly roasted flavour, these mouthwatering peppers are picked and jarred in La Ribera... See more




 


Piquillo Peppers de Pueblo – Tins
Intense in colour and sweet with a slightly roasted flavour, these mouthwatering peppers are picked and jarred in La Ribera... See more





 


Fideo Cabello Romero Angel Hair Pasta (1 kg)
Delicate short angel hair pasta, made only with semolina durum wheat, is a beautiful base for any pasta meal. See more




 


Fideo Cabello Romero Angel Hair Pasta (500g)
Delicate short angel hair pasta, made only with semolina durum wheat, is a beautiful base for any pasta meal. See more





 


Olmeda Spanish Caperberries
Grown in the highlands of Granada, these caperberries enhance the flavour of any dish. They’re low in acidity, and pleasant... See more





Sweet



 


Rabitos Royale Chocolate Stuffed Figs (1 kg)
Decadent bliss, this delicacy from Cáceres, Spain, combines rich chocolate, Mediterranean dried fig, truffle cream and brandy.... See more




 


Rabitos Royale Chocolate Stuffed Figs (9 Units)
Decadent bliss, this delicacy from Cáceres, Spain, combines rich chocolate, Mediterranean dried fig, truffle cream and brandy.... See more





 


Rabitos Royale Chocolate Stuffed Figs (6 Units)
Decadent bliss, this delicacy from Cáceres, Spain, combines rich chocolate, Mediterranean dried fig, truffle cream and brandy.... See more




 


La Higuera Chocohigo
These delicious treats are a blend of rich, chocolate and brandy truffle with a hint of orange and coated in a fine layer... See more





 


Rabitos Royale Chocolate Stuffed Figs (3 Units)
Decadent bliss, this delicacy from Cáceres, Spain, combines rich chocolate, Mediterranean dried fig, truffle cream and brandy.... See more



















Food & Beverage Market










































                    MENU
                




                            MENU
                        







Alibaba.com





                            Sourcing Solutions
                            




                            Services & Membership
                            




                            Help & Community
                            








                        One Request, Multiple Quotes




                        Get the App





















Advanced Search




















































                                Agriculture & Food
                                                                                                                                    



 Machinery, Industrial Parts & Tools
 Health & Beauty
 Gifts, Sports & Toys
 Apparel, Textiles & Accessories
 Packaging, Advertising & Office
 Metallurgy, Chemicals & Plastics
 Electrical Equipment, Components & Telecom
 Home, Lights & Construction
 Electronics
 Auto & Transportation
 Agriculture & Food
 Bags, Shoes & Accessories









Home


Agriculture 


Farm Machinery & Equipment
Garden Tools
Grain
Vegetables
Timber Raw Materials
Agrochemicals
Plant & Animal Oil
Grain Products
Fruit
Nuts & Kernels




Food & Beverage 


Seafood
Seasonings & Condiments
Confectionery
Meat & Poultry
Soft Drinks
Vegetable Products
Health Care Supplement
Dairy
Grain Products
Fruit Products

















Chocolate










Nutella Chocolate
Chocolate Biscuit
Milk Chocolate
Chocolate

View More






Chicken










Frozen Chicken
Chicken Feet
Chicken Paws
Halal Chicken

View More






Energy Drinks










Energy Drinks
Energy Drinks Bottle
Energy Drinks Bulk
Soft Energy Drinks

View More






Fish










Frozen Fish
Frozen Pacific Mackerel Fish
Frozen Horse Mackerel Fish
Frozen Scomber Scombrus Fish

View More






Sugar










Refined Sugar
Brazil Sugar
Granulated White Sugar Refined
Icumsa 45 Sugar

View More








Fresh Garlic










Fresh Normal White Garlic
Fresh White Garlic
Fresh Pure White Garlic
Crop Fresh Garlic

View More






Shrimp










Frozen Vannamei Shrimp
Frozen Shrimp
Shrimp
Dried Shrimp

View More






Fruit & Vegetable Juice










Aloe Fruit Juice Drinks
Fruit Juice Drinks
Passion Fruit Juice
Berries Juice Fruit Concentrate

View More






Milk Powder










Cream Milk Powder
Fat Milk Filled Powder
Skimmed Milk Powder
Milk Powder

View More






Other Food & Beverage










Dried
Tea
Water
Fresh

View More














Categories




Seafood




Fish

Shrimp

Octopus

Crab

Seaweed

Shellfish

Lobster

Squid

Cuttlefish


View All Categories


















Fish Sardine
superior














Fish Tuna
superior














Seasonings & Condiments




Sugar

Plant & Animal Oil

Spices & Herbs Products

Salt

Vinegar

Condensed Milk

Sauce

Non Dairy Creamer

Seafood Condiment


View All Categories


















Tomato Sauce
superior














Sauce Tomato Ketchup
superior














Confectionery




Chocolate

Candy

Candy Toys

Liquid Candy

Gum


View All Categories


















Gum
superior














Chocolate
superior














Meat & Poultry




Poultry Meat

Beef

Pork

Horsemeat

Fowl & Livestock

Meat Product

Sheep Meat

Meat Dishes

Rabbit Meat


View All Categories


















Electric Motorcycle
hot














Skateboard Electric
superior














Soft Drinks




Energy Drinks

Fruit & Vegetable Juice

Bubble Tea Products

Carbonated Drinks

Tea Drinks

Coffee Drinks

Soy Milk

Grain & Nut Juice

Instant Powder Drinks


View All Categories


















Apple Fruit & Vegetable Juice Concentrate
superior














Pear Fruit & Vegetable Juice Drinks
superior














Vegetable Products




Fresh Vegetables

Dried Vegetables

Canned Vegetables

Preserved Vegetables

Frozen Vegetables


View All Categories


















Dehydrated Dried Vegetables
superior














Mushroom Canned Vegetables
superior














Health Care Supplement




Sports Supplements

Anti-Aging

Immune & Anti-Fatigue

Optical Healthcare Products

Albumen Powder

Beauty Products

Antioxidant

Improved Nutritional Anemia

Providing Energy


View All Categories


















Beauty Products
superior














Immune & Anti-Fatigue
superior














Dairy




Milk Powder

Dairy Extractive

Condensed Milk

Milk

Ice Cream

Cheese

Butter

Yogurt

Cream


View All Categories


















Electric Motorcycle
hot














Skateboard Electric
superior














Grain Products




Cereal

Pasta

Starch

Noodles

Rice Noodle

Flour

Coarse Cereal Products

Chinese Snack

Gluten


View All Categories


















Noodles Ramen
superior














Konjac Noodles
superior













All Categories  ›



















 aisn010185238146 
















Textil J Serrano Ltd - Supplier | Colombia | Import Genius
































 












Plans




Limited




Plus




Premium








            LimitedMonitor Your Competitors



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
You'll have access to data from the previous 6-months from the date of your search. We use a rolling date range, so you can always look back 6 months from the current date.




            LimitedMonitor Your Competitors



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
You'll have access to data from the previous 3-months from the date of your search. We use a rolling date range, so you can always look back 3-months from the current date.




            PlusSmall & Medium Business



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 12 months for all companies
You'll have access to data from the previous 12-months from the date of your search. We use a rolling date range, so you can always look back 12-months from the current date.
U.S. ocean freight exports from January 1, 2014 to present for all companies




            Premium            Empire Builder



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from November 2006 to the present for all companies
You'll have access to our entire database of shipping manifests of U.S. Ocean freight imports going back to November 2006.
U.S. ocean freight exports from January 1, 2014 to present for all companies





            LimitedMonitor Your Competitors



Usage

Track the shipping activities of your 3 chosen companies
Our Limited Plan lets you monitor the shipping activities of any three companies across all our databases. Be the first to know when your target company clears a shipment through customs in one of the countries we track.
3 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Our team of account managers and research assistants will help you find contact information for up to 3 companies in our database each month.
Download (CSV and XLS) 5k Records Per Month
If you're planning to do more in-depth research on the companies in our database, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plans, which allow more downloads.
Email Alerts for up to 3 Searches
If you need to track more than 3 companies, product segments, or trade lanes, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plan, which allow more email alerts.




            LimitedMonitor Your Competitors



Usage

10 Company Searches Per Day
10 searches per day may be enough if you are just monitoring a few competitors or researching suppliers in a single industry. If you're looking to connect with sales leads or do more in-depth research, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plan which allows more searches.
3 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Our team of account managers and research assistants will help you find contact information for up to 3 companies in our database each month.
Download (CSV and XLS) 1k Records Per Month
If you're planning to do more in-depth research on the companies in our database, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plan, which allow more downloads.
Email Alerts for up to 3 Company Searches
If you need to track more than 3 companies, product segments, or trade lanes, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plan, which allow more email alerts.




            Plus            Small & Medium Business



Usage

25 Searches Per Day
25 searches per day may be enough if you are just monitoring a few competitors or researching suppliers in a single industry. If you're looking to connect with sales leads or do more in-depth research, you should upgrade to the Premium plan which allows more searches.
25 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Our team of account managers and research assistants will help you find contact information for up to 25 companies in our database each month.
Download (CSV and XLS) 10k Records Per Month
If you're planning to do more in-depth research on the companies in our database, you should upgrade to the Premium plan, which allow more downloads.
Email Alerts for up to 5 Searches
If you need to track more than 5 companies, product segments, or trade lanes, you should upgrade to the Premium plan, which allow more email alerts.




            Premium            Empire Builder



Usage

50 Searches Per Day
 
50 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Our team of account managers and research assistants will help you find contact information for up to 50 companies in our database each month
Download (CSV and XLS) 25k Records Per Month
If you're planning to do more in-depth research on the companies in our database, contact the Sales Department to purchase more credits and export additional shipping records.
Email Alerts for up to 10 Searches





             Plus             Small & Medium Business



Features

Visual Mapping
Our Visual Mapping technology provides an instant snapshot of any company's trade connections. Navigate the global web of trading partners with the click of a mouse and visualize the relationships between companies many degrees apart.







            Premium            Empire Builder



Features

Visual Mapping
Our Visual Mapping technology provides an instant snapshot of any company's trade connections. Navigate the global web of trading partners with the click of a mouse and visualize the relationships between companies many degrees apart.







            Limited            Monitor Your Competitors



Support

Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
Call or e-mail our Customer Service Agents. They will get back to as soon as possible to assist you with your data needs.




            Plus            Small & Medium Business



Support

Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
Call or e-mail our Customer Service Agents. They will get back to as soon as possible to assist you with your data needs.




            Premium            Empire Builder



Support

Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
Call or e-mail our Customer Service Agents. They will get back to as soon as possible to assist you with your data needs.
Dedicated Research Assistant
An experienced trade data specialist will serve as your dedicated account manager to locate hard-to-reach data, perform searches and compile reports on your behalf.




            Limited            Monitor Your Competitors



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
You'll have access to data from the previous 6-months from the date of your search. We use a rolling date range, so you can always look back 6 months from the current date.







X












                   Home                





                        How It Works                    



                            U.S. Data                        

                            Additional Countries                        

                            Our Datasets                        

                            Our Clients                        

                            IG Reviews                        

                            Videos                        

                            Pictures                        

                            Presentation                        



                   Plans & Pricing                

                    Search                

                  Contact Us                
Live Chat				

                    Free Demo                

                    Sign In                

                    Join Now                











English
中文
French










English



中文



French










			                                                Service: 855-573-9976 
                        Sales: +1-855-573-9976

 Live Chat

Choose Language
 English
 中文
 French




 



Hi, may I help you with something?

An ImportGenius.com sales agent is available to answer your question.


							Chat Live Now						

						No, thanks.					







Sign Up






Home
How It Works
Plans & Pricing
Search
Contact Us


Live Chat

2
  



 





Textil J Serrano Ltd

Textil Jserrano is an overseas supplier in Brasil that exports products to Ci  Guacaneme Asociados Ltda. Transportation Type Maritimo.        





 Call +1 (480) 744 2559




Import Genius






                                Our bill of lading data reveals the trading activities of Textil J Serrano Ltd and millions of other manufacturers.                            


Learn More
Join Now




Request a Demo





Would you like to schedule a free demo?
We'd love to show you international trade data relevant to your own business.










Name




Email





Phone






Schedule A Free Demo


















Play muted


International Trade Starts With Our Data









Other companies in our database


 NOU S.A.S.                            

 S.M. ARNOLD, INC.                            

 LEDBAK COLOMBIA SAS                            

 CI MUNDO EXPORT DEL ORIENTE SAS                            

 NORMA GRISELDA  CECEÐA MORALES/IMRECAR                            
















View Sample Shipment Records
Shipment Alert Subscription
Contact This Company



Sign Up

 





Sample shipment record for Textil J Serrano Ltd
Textil Jserrano is an overseas supplier in Brasil that exports products to Ci  Guacaneme Asociados Ltda. Transportation Type Maritimo.


            Bill of Lading        





Manufacturer / Shipper
Consignee



Textil Jserrano
ROD RAPOSO TAVARES, KM 43/44 CEP 06


Ci  Guacaneme Asociados Ltda
CR 27 B   74   19



Acquisition
Destination



Brasil


Colombia



Product Description





                                        DO 2I120957DECLARACION(2-2) MERCANCIA NUEVA, NOS ACOGEMOS AL DECRETO 3803 DE OCTUBRE DE 20                                    

                                        DO 2I120957DECLARACION(2-2) MERCANCIA NUEVA, NOS ACOGEMOS AL DECRETO 3803 DE OCTUBRE DE 20                                    





Other Information Available




Gross Weight (KG), FOB (USD), Insurance (USD), Freight (USD), CIF (USD), Brand ID, Operation Type








Arrival Date2012-10-04Transportation TypeMaritimoHS Code6304190000CustomsCartagenaQuantity / Unit270.00/U 





Subscribe to access the complete shipping history for Textil J Serrano Ltd Join Now








How will your business use our trade data?
If you're involved in international trade, our database of shipping manifests will help you find opportunities to grow your business.

Find Trading Partners You Can Trust
Monitor Competitors' Shipping Activities
Connect With Sales Prospects














                            "Very informative and great site and so quick. Pretty slick."
                        







Betty Fatzie

                                                                    President,                                 
                                                                    Lab Products, Inc.                                
                            






                            "The service was great, with a reasonable price and great results. We have now started using another supplier from China. We just ordered our first container from the new supplier and with the savings it more than paid for the ImportGenius.com service on the first container load."
                        







Cleve Kurz

                                
                                                                    Gifford Monument Works                                
                            






                            "Import Genius is not merely an investment for our organization, it’s a vital instrument to effectively manage our time. It has afforded us the ability to quickly segment, target and position ourselves in front of prospective clients. Thank you, Import Genius!"
                        







David Bryant

                                                                    Director of Business Development,                                 
                                                                    John S. James Co.                                
                            






                            "Import Genius data is fantastic for evaluating component manufacturers in China."
                        







Sanjay Dastoor

                                
                                                                    BoostedBoards.com                                
                            






                            "We have confidence that we're working with the best manufacturers in part because Import Genius showed us that they already supply some of the world's top brands"
                        







Yaniv Masjedi

                                                                    Vice President,                                 
                                                                    Nextiva.com                                
                            






                            "Import Genius is a highly informative tool for monitoring public companies' operating activities. It is an invaluable part of our research."
                        







Eric DeLamarter

                                                                    Managing Partner,                                 
                                                                    Half Moon Capital                                
                            






                            "We find new clients for our customs brokerage in the ImportGenius database almost every day"
                        







Jayson Gispan

                                                                    Customs Brokerage Operations Manager,                                 
                                                                    Flexport.com                                
                            






                            "ImportGenius is a great research tool. We use it to evaluate manufacturers to make sure we are working with only the highest quality, most reliable suppliers"
                        







Chris Friedland

                                                                    Founder / CEO,                                 
                                                                    Build.com                                
                            






                            "ImportGenius gave us visibility into the actual shipping histories of the manufacturers we were evaluating and helped us feel comfortable we were working with the best suppliers in China."
                        







Morena Simitic

                                                                    COO,                                 
                                                                    BellaBeat.com                                
                            
























Shipment Alert Subscription



                        Receive free shipment alerts by email whenever Textil J Serrano Ltd clears a shipment through customs.                        

Processing, please wait ...







Submit












Contact Textil J Serrano Ltd










 



Name



Business



Email



Phone




Submit




Processing, please wait ...

 

 




Features



Save and Share Reports
Easily get your searches out of Import Genius and into your team’s hands for further analysis. Export your findings to XLS or CSV, or send reports via email. It’s the simple things that make our trade data even more valuable to you.



See the Supply Chain
Visual Mapping shows you exactly how your target companies and their trading partners connect. Search by shipper and see everyone they’ve shipped to. Or search by consignee and see all their suppliers. Zoom in on any company to see their own trading network. Dive deep into international trade and discover the links in anyone’s supply chain.



Get Real-time Shipment Alerts
Stay on top of your competitors, suppliers, and customers with real-time alerts. Just set up a search and get an email whenever a new shipment matches your terms. Import Genius lets you know the moment they bring in a rival product or start shipping to a new partner.









Textil J Serrano Ltd
You've viewed 20 profile pages on Import Genius, which is the most we allow for free. Sign up for ImportGenius to get more details on over 3 million importers and exporters. It only takes seconds.






Sign Up for Import Genius! 








Plans




Limited
Monitor Your Competitors




Recommended Plan
Plus
Small & Medium Business




Premium
Empire Builder






Price





$
99
594
/month
for 6 months



                        Sign Up                    






$
199
1,194
/month
for 6 months



                        Sign Up                    






$
399
2,394
/month
for 6 months



                        Sign Up                    







Data




Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
View Details




Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 12 months for all companies
U.S. ocean freight exports from January 1, 2014 to present for all companies
View Details




Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from November 2006 to the present for all companies
U.S. ocean freight exports from January 1, 2014 to present for all companies
View Details






Usage





Track the shipping activities of your 3 chosen companies
3 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Download (CSV and XLS) 5k Records Per Month
Email Alerts for up to 3 Searches

View Details





25 Searches Per Day
25 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Download (CSV and XLS) 10k Records Per Month
Email Alerts for up to 5 Searches

View Details





50 Searches Per Day
50 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Download (CSV and XLS) 25k Records Per Month
Email Alerts for up to 10 Searches

View Details






Features


 


Visual Mapping
View Details




Visual Mapping
View Details






Support




Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
View Details




Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
View Details





Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
Dedicated Research Assistant

View Details






  






View All U.S. Imports
Instantly search 21,508,010 ocean freight records to monitor U.S. importers, research suppliers, generate sales leads and more.


As Featured In






















What is Import Genius





Who Uses Import Genius





Available Data Fields





Schedule Live Demo







What is Import Genius


												Import Genius reveals the trading activities of importers and exporters around the world.								

												We give you hard data about your overseas suppliers and domestic competitors. Using shipping databases from Customs agencies in the United States, Latin America, and India, Import Genius can help you find reliable new trading partners, monitor your competitors’ shipments, and keep an eye on your current suppliers and customers.								

												Our team of seasoned import-export veterans, cutting-edge software developers, and customer service professionals has worked for years to build the world's most powerful and accessible database of international trade intelligence.								



												We do this for a diverse client base that requires keen insight into international trade.								

												Our customers include some of the world's top importers, exporters, freight forwarders, logistics companies, manufacturers, investment banks, financial analysts, intellectual property attorneys, and more. They use our tools to:								

Research the trade activity of importers and suppliers
Identify and vet new sources for any kind of product
Monitor the competition and their trade connections
Generate sales leads for transportation and logistics companies
Track the activity of publicly-traded companies
Investigate and enforce intellectual property infringement
Ensure exclusive agent compliance




Who Uses Import Genius

Sourcing Professionals...

			Use our service to view shipping histories for suppliers.		

			We provide access to detailed customs records, letting you verify suppliers' true shipping volumes and U.S. customer lists. You can also look up your competing import firms to find where they buy their goods.		
+ Learn More
Competitive Intelligence Analysts...

			Use our service to learn where rivals source products.		

			We give clear insights into the importing volumes, new product releases, and broader competitive dynamics of your industry.		
+ Learn More


Sales & Marketing Teams...

			Use our service to generate sales prospects.		

			We give you the tools to target importers based on product type, location, shipping volumes, and more.		
+ Learn More
Financial Analysts...

			Use our service to monitor public companies' imports.		

			We offer rare data on the success or failure of new product launches, shipping trends and other operating data for companies in any industry.		
+ Learn More



Available Data Fields

Import Genius Data Fields

												By collecting the ocean freight bill of lading for all U.S. imports in our database, Import Genius provides unprecedented access to near real-time information on virtually every industry and company importing goods into the country.								

												For each shipment entering the U.S. by ocean, we provide access to the following information.								
Additional Fields Available for Some Shipments:

Phone Number
Fax Number
Email
Contact Person



List of Data Fields



ConsigneeThe company importing the shipment into the U.S.Consignee AddressThe address of the company importing the shipment into the U.S.ShipperThe overseas company exporting the shipment to the U.S.Shipper AddressThe address of the overseas company exporting the shipment to the U.S.Product DescriptionThe exporter's description of the shipment as it appears on the bill of lading or shipping manifestGross WeightThe gross weight of the shipment, excluding the weight of the actual container. This can appear in either pounds or kilograms at the discretion of the exporterNumber Of UnitsThe quantity of boxes customs would find if they were to open the shipment for inspection.VolumeThe volume of the shipment, generally defined in cubic meters or container base measurements (CBM)Arrival DateThe date the shipment arrives within the customs territory of the U.S.Foreign PortThe last port the shipment passes through before arriving in the U.S.Country Of OriginThe country of the last foreign port the shipment passes through before arriving in the U.S.U.S. PortThe U.S. port where the shipment enters the customs territory of the U.S.Carrier CodeThe four digit Standard Carrier Alpha Code of the ocean carrier or freight forwarder managing the transit of the shipmentVoyage NumberA unique code assigned to that particular sailing of the ship between two portsVessel NameThe name of the ship transporting the shipmentShip Registered InThe country where the ship is officially registeredBill Of Lading NumberThe unique number assigned to this particular shipment by the ocean carrier or freight forwarderContainer NumberThe unique number assigned to the ocean shipping container carrying the shipment in questionMarks & NumbersAny text or numbers appearing on the cartons 






Ready for a live demo?
Fill out this form and we'll contact you right away to set up a live demo of Import Genius.


Schedule Live Demo



Processing, please wait ...





Name

Tell us your Full Name


Email

Enter a valid email address


Phone

Enter valid phone number


Preferred Date

Let us know your preferred date


Preferred Time (In Your Country)

01:00 am
01:30 am
02:00 am
02:30 am
03:00 am
03:30 am
04:00 am
04:30 am
05:00 am
05:30 am
06:00 am
06:30 am
07:00 am
07:30 am
08:00 am
08:30 am
09:00 am
09:30 am
10:00 am
10:30 am
11:00 am
11:30 am
12:00 am
12:30 am
01:00 pm
01:30 pm
02:00 pm
02:30 pm
03:00 pm
03:30 pm
04:00 pm
04:30 pm
05:00 pm
05:30 pm
06:00 pm
06:30 pm
07:00 pm
07:30 pm
08:00 pm
08:30 pm
09:00 pm
09:30 pm
10:00 pm
10:30 pm
11:00 pm
11:30 pm
12:00 pm

Let us know your preferred time


Country

Required


Timezone

Required


What data are you interested in?

Let us know what you are most interested to learn



Submit



 















Import Genius

How It Works
Plans & Pricing
Our Trade Data Blog
Search
Latin Trade Data

Import Genius Reviews & Press Coverage
Who Uses Import Genius
Contact Us



Latest Posts




                                    Trump Properties Have…                                




                                    Solar panels: imports…                                




                                    Limited Plan Now Available                                




                                    Chilean salmon exports…                                




                                    India, US palm oil imports…                                




Company Profiles



                                    Alejandra Maru Molinares                                



                                    Glenmark Pharmaceuticals Ltd                                



                                    Unitecnic Media Solutions                                



                                    Sierra Flower Tranding Ontario                                



                                    Electro Importaciones Ac  S.a.s.                                











                     
                                            21,508,010  Records in our database and counting





Customer Support Team: 

                    Tel:  855-573-9976
                    International: +1 480-745-3396
                    Fax: +1 602-428-9400
info@importgenius.com

                    8901 E Pima Center Pkwy, 
		    Suite 105 
                    Scottsdale, AZ 85258


Shanghai, China:

                    Tel: +86-21-63806036


                    Mobile No.: +86-13671737628
                    Fax Number: +86-21-63806036


Shenzhen, China
                    
                            Tel: +86-755-89517585
                            Mob: +86-13925258002
                            Fax: +86-755-89517585                



Have questions? We'll reply quickly!





									         		Type your info below								         		











Message



Submit

Processing, please wait ...

 

 

                Trainings, Demos, and General Contact All Available            
Or Call Us:
Service:

                    +1-855-573-9976                
Sales:

                    +1-855-573-9976                
Back to top

 





All Rights Reserved. Copyright © 2017. Trade Data Services, Inc. 0.1562
 






 

 




We're Offline
Please leave us a message



To chat with a representative of Import Genius, your browser needs to be Internet Explorer 9 or higher. Please fill out the form below and a representative will contact you as soon as possible.



Name



Email



Phone



Message



Send




X





















Serrano Vietnam Co Ltd in San Leandro, CA
































 












Plans




Limited




Plus




Premium








            LimitedMonitor Your Competitors



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
You'll have access to data from the previous 6-months from the date of your search. We use a rolling date range, so you can always look back 6 months from the current date.




            LimitedMonitor Your Competitors



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
You'll have access to data from the previous 3-months from the date of your search. We use a rolling date range, so you can always look back 3-months from the current date.




            PlusSmall & Medium Business



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 12 months for all companies
You'll have access to data from the previous 12-months from the date of your search. We use a rolling date range, so you can always look back 12-months from the current date.
U.S. ocean freight exports from January 1, 2014 to present for all companies




            Premium            Empire Builder



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from November 2006 to the present for all companies
You'll have access to our entire database of shipping manifests of U.S. Ocean freight imports going back to November 2006.
U.S. ocean freight exports from January 1, 2014 to present for all companies





            LimitedMonitor Your Competitors



Usage

Track the shipping activities of your 3 chosen companies
Our Limited Plan lets you monitor the shipping activities of any three companies across all our databases. Be the first to know when your target company clears a shipment through customs in one of the countries we track.
3 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Our team of account managers and research assistants will help you find contact information for up to 3 companies in our database each month.
Download (CSV and XLS) 5k Records Per Month
If you're planning to do more in-depth research on the companies in our database, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plans, which allow more downloads.
Email Alerts for up to 3 Searches
If you need to track more than 3 companies, product segments, or trade lanes, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plan, which allow more email alerts.




            LimitedMonitor Your Competitors



Usage

10 Company Searches Per Day
10 searches per day may be enough if you are just monitoring a few competitors or researching suppliers in a single industry. If you're looking to connect with sales leads or do more in-depth research, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plan which allows more searches.
3 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Our team of account managers and research assistants will help you find contact information for up to 3 companies in our database each month.
Download (CSV and XLS) 1k Records Per Month
If you're planning to do more in-depth research on the companies in our database, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plan, which allow more downloads.
Email Alerts for up to 3 Company Searches
If you need to track more than 3 companies, product segments, or trade lanes, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plan, which allow more email alerts.




            Plus            Small & Medium Business



Usage

25 Searches Per Day
25 searches per day may be enough if you are just monitoring a few competitors or researching suppliers in a single industry. If you're looking to connect with sales leads or do more in-depth research, you should upgrade to the Premium plan which allows more searches.
25 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Our team of account managers and research assistants will help you find contact information for up to 25 companies in our database each month.
Download (CSV and XLS) 10k Records Per Month
If you're planning to do more in-depth research on the companies in our database, you should upgrade to the Premium plan, which allow more downloads.
Email Alerts for up to 5 Searches
If you need to track more than 5 companies, product segments, or trade lanes, you should upgrade to the Premium plan, which allow more email alerts.




            Premium            Empire Builder



Usage

50 Searches Per Day
 
50 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Our team of account managers and research assistants will help you find contact information for up to 50 companies in our database each month
Download (CSV and XLS) 25k Records Per Month
If you're planning to do more in-depth research on the companies in our database, contact the Sales Department to purchase more credits and export additional shipping records.
Email Alerts for up to 10 Searches





             Plus             Small & Medium Business



Features

Visual Mapping
Our Visual Mapping technology provides an instant snapshot of any company's trade connections. Navigate the global web of trading partners with the click of a mouse and visualize the relationships between companies many degrees apart.







            Premium            Empire Builder



Features

Visual Mapping
Our Visual Mapping technology provides an instant snapshot of any company's trade connections. Navigate the global web of trading partners with the click of a mouse and visualize the relationships between companies many degrees apart.







            Limited            Monitor Your Competitors



Support

Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
Call or e-mail our Customer Service Agents. They will get back to as soon as possible to assist you with your data needs.




            Plus            Small & Medium Business



Support

Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
Call or e-mail our Customer Service Agents. They will get back to as soon as possible to assist you with your data needs.




            Premium            Empire Builder



Support

Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
Call or e-mail our Customer Service Agents. They will get back to as soon as possible to assist you with your data needs.
Dedicated Research Assistant
An experienced trade data specialist will serve as your dedicated account manager to locate hard-to-reach data, perform searches and compile reports on your behalf.




            Limited            Monitor Your Competitors



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
You'll have access to data from the previous 6-months from the date of your search. We use a rolling date range, so you can always look back 6 months from the current date.







X












                   Home                





                        How It Works                    



                            U.S. Data                        

                            Additional Countries                        

                            Our Datasets                        

                            Our Clients                        

                            IG Reviews                        

                            Videos                        

                            Pictures                        

                            Presentation                        



                   Plans & Pricing                

                    Search                

                  Contact Us                
Live Chat				

                    Free Demo                

                    Sign In                

                    Join Now                











English
中文
French










English



中文



French



 

Get global shipment alerts for Serrano Vietnam Co  Ltd, $9.95 /month

Processing, please wait ...







Cardholder's Name


Tell us your Full Name



Credit Card No. 








Enter a valid Card No.



Exp. Date

1 January
2 February
3 March
4 April
5 May
6 June
7 July
8 August
9 September
10 October
11 November
12 December




2017
2018
2019
2020
2021
2022
2023
2024
2025
2026



Postal Code / Zip


(or Postal Code if not in the USA)




  Terms of Service




Submit















			                                                Service: 855-573-9976 
                        Sales: +1-855-573-9976

 Live Chat

Choose Language
 English
 中文
 French




 



Hi, may I help you with something?

An ImportGenius.com sales agent is available to answer your question.


							Chat Live Now						

						No, thanks.					







Sign Up






Home
How It Works
Plans & Pricing
Search
Contact Us


Live Chat

2
  



 



Serrano Vietnam Co  Ltd

Serrano Vietnam Co., Ltd exports to Creative Images International,inc through the port of Oakland, California        





 Call +1 (480) 744 2559




Import Genius






                                Our bill of lading data reveals the trading activities of Serrano Vietnam Co  Ltd and millions of other manufacturers.                            


Learn More
Join Now




Request a Demo





Would you like to schedule a free demo?
We'd love to show you international trade data relevant to your own business.










Name




Email





Phone






Schedule A Free Demo


















Play muted


International Trade Starts With Our Data









Other companies in our database

 SAMSUNG ELECTRONICS AMERICA INCORPO
 FRITO LAY DOMINICANA, S.A.         
 NINTENDO OF AMERICA INC.
 TRANSITYRE FRANCE S.A. MICHELIN EXP
 LULULEMON USA INC
















View Sample Shipment Records
Shipment Alert Subscription
Contact This Company



Sign Up

 





Sample shipment record for Serrano Vietnam Co  Ltd
Serrano Vietnam Co., Ltd exports to Creative Images International,inc through the port of Oakland, California


                                Bill of Lading                            





Manufacturer / Shipper
Consignee



SERRANO VIETNAM CO., LTD
NO.6 TU DO AVE - VSIPTHUAN AN, BINH DUONG, VIETNAM


CREATIVE IMAGES INTERNATIONAL INC
1444 FACTOR AVENUE, SAN LEANDRO,CA 94577 USA



Notify Party
Marks and Numbers



TO ORDER




AS ADDRESSED
AS ADDRESSED





Master Bill of Lading Number
Container Number



MAEU851951946


MSKU9342627
MSKU9342627


Product Description




BEDROOM SET
BEDROOM SET









Bill of LadingAMAWE061253072Arrival Date2007-01-05Weight (LB)17,494Weight (KG)7,952Quantity193 PKGContainer Count1Voyage No.0702Port of LoadingTHANH PHO HO CHI MINHPort of DischargeOAKLAND, CALIFORNIAVessel NameERAMSTERDAMCarrier CodeAMAWCountry Of OriginVietnamPlace Of ReceiptHOCHIMINH CITY,VI 





Subscribe to access the complete shipping history for Serrano Vietnam Co  Ltd. Join Now 







How will your business use our trade data?
If you're involved in international trade, our database of shipping manifests will help you find opportunities to grow your business.

Find Trading Partners You Can Trust
Monitor Competitors' Shipping Activities
Connect With Sales Prospects














                            "Very informative and great site and so quick. Pretty slick."
                        







Betty Fatzie

                                                                    President,                                 
                                                                    Lab Products, Inc.                                
                            






                            "The service was great, with a reasonable price and great results. We have now started using another supplier from China. We just ordered our first container from the new supplier and with the savings it more than paid for the ImportGenius.com service on the first container load."
                        







Cleve Kurz

                                
                                                                    Gifford Monument Works                                
                            






                            "Import Genius is not merely an investment for our organization, it’s a vital instrument to effectively manage our time. It has afforded us the ability to quickly segment, target and position ourselves in front of prospective clients. Thank you, Import Genius!"
                        







David Bryant

                                                                    Director of Business Development,                                 
                                                                    John S. James Co.                                
                            






                            "Import Genius data is fantastic for evaluating component manufacturers in China."
                        







Sanjay Dastoor

                                
                                                                    BoostedBoards.com                                
                            






                            "We have confidence that we're working with the best manufacturers in part because Import Genius showed us that they already supply some of the world's top brands"
                        







Yaniv Masjedi

                                                                    Vice President,                                 
                                                                    Nextiva.com                                
                            






                            "Import Genius is a highly informative tool for monitoring public companies' operating activities. It is an invaluable part of our research."
                        







Eric DeLamarter

                                                                    Managing Partner,                                 
                                                                    Half Moon Capital                                
                            






                            "We find new clients for our customs brokerage in the ImportGenius database almost every day"
                        







Jayson Gispan

                                                                    Customs Brokerage Operations Manager,                                 
                                                                    Flexport.com                                
                            






                            "ImportGenius is a great research tool. We use it to evaluate manufacturers to make sure we are working with only the highest quality, most reliable suppliers"
                        







Chris Friedland

                                                                    Founder / CEO,                                 
                                                                    Build.com                                
                            






                            "ImportGenius gave us visibility into the actual shipping histories of the manufacturers we were evaluating and helped us feel comfortable we were working with the best suppliers in China."
                        







Morena Simitic

                                                                    COO,                                 
                                                                    BellaBeat.com                                
                            
























Shipment Alert Subscription



                        Get e-mail alerts when Serrano Vietnam Co  Ltd has new shipments.                        

Processing, please wait ...









Submit












Contact Serrano Vietnam Co  Ltd







 



Name



Business



Email



Phone




Submit




Processing, please wait ...

 

 





Features



Save and Share Reports
Easily get your searches out of Import Genius and into your team’s hands for further analysis. Export your findings to XLS or CSV, or send reports via email. It’s the simple things that make our trade data even more valuable to you.



See the Supply Chain
Visual Mapping shows you exactly how your target companies and their trading partners connect. Search by shipper and see everyone they’ve shipped to. Or search by consignee and see all their suppliers. Zoom in on any company to see their own trading network. Dive deep into international trade and discover the links in anyone’s supply chain.



Get Real-time Shipment Alerts
Stay on top of your competitors, suppliers, and customers with real-time alerts. Just set up a search and get an email whenever a new shipment matches your terms. Import Genius lets you know the moment they bring in a rival product or start shipping to a new partner.








Serrano Vietnam Co  Ltd
You've viewed 20 profile pages on Import Genius, which is the most we allow for free. Sign up for ImportGenius to get more details on over 3 million importers and exporters. It only takes seconds.






Sign Up for Import Genius! 








Plans




Limited
Monitor Your Competitors




Recommended Plan
Plus
Small & Medium Business




Premium
Empire Builder






Price





$
99
594
/month
for 6 months



                        Sign Up                    






$
199
1,194
/month
for 6 months



                        Sign Up                    






$
399
2,394
/month
for 6 months



                        Sign Up                    







Data




Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
View Details




Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 12 months for all companies
U.S. ocean freight exports from January 1, 2014 to present for all companies
View Details




Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from November 2006 to the present for all companies
U.S. ocean freight exports from January 1, 2014 to present for all companies
View Details






Usage





Track the shipping activities of your 3 chosen companies
3 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Download (CSV and XLS) 5k Records Per Month
Email Alerts for up to 3 Searches

View Details





25 Searches Per Day
25 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Download (CSV and XLS) 10k Records Per Month
Email Alerts for up to 5 Searches

View Details





50 Searches Per Day
50 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Download (CSV and XLS) 25k Records Per Month
Email Alerts for up to 10 Searches

View Details






Features


 


Visual Mapping
View Details




Visual Mapping
View Details






Support




Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
View Details




Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
View Details





Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
Dedicated Research Assistant

View Details






  






View All U.S. Imports
Instantly search 109,970,574 ocean freight records to monitor U.S. importers, research suppliers, generate sales leads and more.


As Featured In





















What is Import Genius





Who Uses Import Genius





Available Data Fields







What is Import Genius


												Import Genius reveals the trading activities of importers and exporters around the world.								

												We give you hard data about your overseas suppliers and domestic competitors. Using shipping databases from Customs agencies in the United States, Latin America, and India, Import Genius can help you find reliable new trading partners, monitor your competitors’ shipments, and keep an eye on your current suppliers and customers.								

												Our team of seasoned import-export veterans, cutting-edge software developers, and customer service professionals has worked for years to build the world's most powerful and accessible database of international trade intelligence.								



												We do this for a diverse client base that requires keen insight into international trade.								

												Our customers include some of the world's top importers, exporters, freight forwarders, logistics companies, manufacturers, investment banks, financial analysts, intellectual property attorneys, and more. They use our tools to:								

Research the trade activity of importers and suppliers
Identify and vet new sources for any kind of product
Monitor the competition and their trade connections
Generate sales leads for transportation and logistics companies
Track the activity of publicly-traded companies
Investigate and enforce intellectual property infringement
Ensure exclusive agent compliance




Who Uses Import Genius

Sourcing Professionals...

			Use our service to view shipping histories for suppliers.		

			We provide access to detailed customs records, letting you verify suppliers' true shipping volumes and U.S. customer lists. You can also look up your competing import firms to find where they buy their goods.		
+ Learn More
Competitive Intelligence Analysts...

			Use our service to learn where rivals source products.		

			We give clear insights into the importing volumes, new product releases, and broader competitive dynamics of your industry.		
+ Learn More


Sales & Marketing Teams...

			Use our service to generate sales prospects.		

			We give you the tools to target importers based on product type, location, shipping volumes, and more.		
+ Learn More
Financial Analysts...

			Use our service to monitor public companies' imports.		

			We offer rare data on the success or failure of new product launches, shipping trends and other operating data for companies in any industry.		
+ Learn More



Available Data Fields

Import Genius Data Fields

												By collecting the ocean freight bill of lading for all U.S. imports in our database, Import Genius provides unprecedented access to near real-time information on virtually every industry and company importing goods into the country.								

												For each shipment entering the U.S. by ocean, we provide access to the following information.								
Additional Fields Available for Some Shipments:

Phone Number
Fax Number
Email
Contact Person



List of Data Fields



ConsigneeThe company importing the shipment into the U.S.Consignee AddressThe address of the company importing the shipment into the U.S.ShipperThe overseas company exporting the shipment to the U.S.Shipper AddressThe address of the overseas company exporting the shipment to the U.S.Product DescriptionThe exporter's description of the shipment as it appears on the bill of lading or shipping manifestGross WeightThe gross weight of the shipment, excluding the weight of the actual container. This can appear in either pounds or kilograms at the discretion of the exporterNumber Of UnitsThe quantity of boxes customs would find if they were to open the shipment for inspection.VolumeThe volume of the shipment, generally defined in cubic meters or container base measurements (CBM)Arrival DateThe date the shipment arrives within the customs territory of the U.S.Foreign PortThe last port the shipment passes through before arriving in the U.S.Country Of OriginThe country of the last foreign port the shipment passes through before arriving in the U.S.U.S. PortThe U.S. port where the shipment enters the customs territory of the U.S.Carrier CodeThe four digit Standard Carrier Alpha Code of the ocean carrier or freight forwarder managing the transit of the shipmentVoyage NumberA unique code assigned to that particular sailing of the ship between two portsVessel NameThe name of the ship transporting the shipmentShip Registered InThe country where the ship is officially registeredBill Of Lading NumberThe unique number assigned to this particular shipment by the ocean carrier or freight forwarderContainer NumberThe unique number assigned to the ocean shipping container carrying the shipment in questionMarks & NumbersAny text or numbers appearing on the cartons 

















Import Genius

How It Works
Plans & Pricing
Our Trade Data Blog
Search
Latin Trade Data

Import Genius Reviews & Press Coverage
Who Uses Import Genius
Contact Us



Latest Posts




                                    Trump Properties Have…                                




                                    India, US palm oil imports…                                




                                    Chilean salmon exports…                                




                                    Limited Plan Now Available                                




                                    Solar panels: imports…                                




Company Profiles



                                    Electrolux Professional Inc. (nc)                                



                                    Hobart Services                                



                                    Daikin Parts Distrwar. Daikin                                



                                    The Tai Apprarel Group Inc                                



                                    Jetway Usa Llc                                











                     
                                            109,970,574  Records in our database and counting





Customer Support Team: 

                    Tel:  855-573-9976
                    International: +1 480-745-3396
                    Fax: +1 602-428-9400
info@importgenius.com

                    8901 E Pima Center Pkwy, 
		    Suite 105 
                    Scottsdale, AZ 85258


Shanghai, China:

                    Tel: +86-21-63806036


                    Mobile No.: +86-13671737628
                    Fax Number: +86-21-63806036


Shenzhen, China
                    
                            Tel: +86-755-89517585
                            Mob: +86-13925258002
                            Fax: +86-755-89517585                



Have questions? We'll reply quickly!





									         		Type your info below								         		











Message



Submit

Processing, please wait ...

 

 

                Trainings, Demos, and General Contact All Available            
Or Call Us:
Service:

                    +1-855-573-9976                
Sales:

                    +1-855-573-9976                
Back to top

 





All Rights Reserved. Copyright © 2017. Trade Data Services, Inc. 0.2703
 






 

 




We're Offline
Please leave us a message



To chat with a representative of Import Genius, your browser needs to be Internet Explorer 9 or higher. Please fill out the form below and a representative will contact you as soon as possible.



Name



Email



Phone



Message



Send




X




















Manufacturers and Suppliers On Diiiig.com

























































Remove / Update Profile
Register
Sign In
Add Company in 2 minutes - Click here
















 


Add Product --Click here














Pages Navigation MenuB2B Site Directory
Apparel
Construction & Real Estate
Minerals & Metallurgy
Categories
List Company for free

























You are here > 
    
Manufacturers




   PREMIUM BUSINESS LISTINGS   








 

Lavandula

 
                                Cumhuriyet Caddesi no:18, 48740 Turunc mah./Muğla, Türkiye                            





 

Jute Bags , Jute Products

 
                                MIRPUR DOHS, HOUSE#220,ROAD#04,DHAKA # 1216                            





 

PT Guna Indotirta

 
                                Jalan Jatinegara Timur No.39, Jatinegara, Kota Jakarta Timur, Daerah Khusus Ibukota Jakarta 13310, Indonesia                            





 

Cerritos Infiniti

 
                                11011 East South Street' Cerritos' CA 90703                            





 

ONE WORLD IMPEX PVT LTD

 
                                D-1 Dhaval Ganga, 1, Carter Road, Bandra (west) ,mumbai ,Maharashtra, India                            





 

DDX

 
                                Valikhanova st, 24 apt 31, Almaty,Kazakhstan                            





 

AZman Alkhaleej Co.

 
                                Hawalli Tunis St. ,Kuwait                            





 

vk.group

 
                                shriramnagar, nasik, Maharashtra, India                            





 

Baharoglu Agricultural Prod. & Trade Co

 
                                2. Organize San. Bolgesi Baspinar, Gaziantep, Turkey                            





 

Kavkasioni XXI

 
                                Petriashvili 10, Tbilisi,  Georgia                            




  



Recently Added Products






 
 
No Review 


LED High bay
 2nd Building, Ganghuaxing Industry Zone, Chongqing Road No.2,Fuyong
AGC Lighting specializing in designing and manufacturing the superb quality and cost efficient LED industrial […] Read More










 
 
No Review 


Aarti International Limited
 G.T. Road, Miller Ganj, Ludhiana
Aarti International Limited is the leading yarn manufacturer in India.










 
 
No Review 


Murata Impex Pvt Ltd India
 Murata Impex Pvt Ltd Plot No D 8/7 Turbhe MIDC, Turbhe, Navi Mumbai, Maharashtra 400705, India
We are the leading international Suppliers of Comber Noil & Yarn waste (Textile Spinning Waste) […] Read More










 
 
No Review 


BGA 572 test socket TEST FIXTURE SOCKET BGA testing solution
 zhongyuguan road,baoan district, shenzhen city, china
Shenzhen YounRongDa micro electronics technology co.Ltd is a professional semiconductor test program development,manufacturing and sales […] Read More










 
 
No Review 


Traditional Work On Computer or Smart Phone
 Building no. 27, 3rd floor, deep complex, court road amritsar
Golden Opportunity don’t miss that Traditional Work On Computer or Smart Phone Online Video Watching/offline […] Read More










 
 
No Review 


PCB & PCBA
 Rm1906, No.1277, Kaifa Road, Cixi, Ningbo, China
Cylectronix Corporation is a professional supplier of Printed Circuit Board Assemblies. We are located in […] Read More










 
 
No Review 


Sintered Filter Tube
 No 728, Gongyuan Guoji, Jinsui Road, Hongqi District, Xinxiang, Henan 453000 China
Filter Media 1. Leer Multilayer Sintered Mesh 2. Leer Sintered Metal Fiber Felt 3. Leer […] Read More










 
 
No Review 


marjoram and hibiscus flowers
 egypt
Botanical Name ( Oregano Marjoram ) Available Form: Marjoram Green Green large cut Marjoram Green […] Read More










 
 
No Review 


CASING PIPE,TUBING,PUP JOINT,COUPLING,CROSSOVER
 Industrial Park of Jinghai Town,Tianjin ,China
Tianjin Dalipu Oil Country Tubular Goods Co., Ltd is currently an emerging production and marketing enterprise […] Read More










 
 
No Review 


Egyptian silica sand
 Cairo. egypt
EL HASHEM FOR MINERALS & QUARRIES MATERIALS is a leading trading company in Egypt it […] Read More










 
 
No Review 


guano phosphate
 JL. RAYA WOTAN NO.8 PANCENG KM .34 
NAME : PT.GEMAH RIPAH LOH JINAWI INDUSTRI LOCATION : JL. RAYA WATONAN NO. 8 PANCENG […] Read More










 
 
No Review 


Helios Infrapro Private Limited
 Ground Floor,561, Block N, New Alipore Kolkata - 700 053
Helios Infrapro is one of leading provider of electrostatic precipitator spares and other air pollution […] Read More










 
 
No Review 


organic fertilizer turkey
 turkey
we are producer of organic fertilizers located in Turkey. We have our own leonardite quarry […] Read More










 
 
No Review 


Sumiro Private Detectives
 Rohini
Sumiro professional detectives are expertise in providing extensive and intensive private investigation services in New […] Read More










 
 
No Review 


Base Oil Product
 Al Kharj Saudi Arabia
Our company is selling Base Oil the main product componets in the manufacture of Lubricant […] Read More










 
 
No Review 


Kites
 Jalan Dolok Sanggul - Siborong - Borong, Lintong Nihuta, Kabupaten Humbang Hasundutan, Sumatera Utara 22475, Indonesia
kami adalah toko kites dari indonesia , selama ini kami menjual kites di dalam negeri […] Read More










 
 
No Review 


oil and gas, mining, chemicals, ICT, electronics
 19 road 1 Eliminigwe Housing estate, Elelenwo
Oil and gas, petroleum products, mining, drilling tools, mining and dredging tools










 
 
No Review 


Simple PBX System
 22 Sin Ming Lane #05-84. Midview City, Singapore
More number of businesses and industries are embracing VoIP in their day-to-day communication realizing the […] Read More










 
 
No Review 


Balloon,Latex Balloon , Party Balloon
 Bandar Putera ,41200 Klang , Selangor , Malaysia
Since 1980, the manufacturing of highest quality latex balloons started in Ho Chi Minh, Vietnam. […] Read More










 
 
No Review 


Naseem Sports
 Hunterpura sialkot
We are leading professional manufacturers and suppliers of all type of Motorbike Suits, Motorbike Leather […] Read More










 
 
No Review 


Naseem Industries
 Hunterpura sialkot
We are one of the leading suppliers of all kinds of Surgical Instruments, Dental Instruments, […] Read More










 
 
No Review 


Anchors
 Yinxian Street ,Ningbo, China
The Sleeve Anchor is constructed of high quality steel parts. Each part is zinc plated and assembled into a complete ready-to-use anchor. The anchor consists of a threaded stud with an outwardly flared cone-shaped end.










 
 
No Review 


Jiaxing Chisheng Bearing Co.,Ltd
 267 He Xing Bei Lu, Nanhu Qu, Jiaxing Shi, Zhejiang Sheng, China, 314000
Jiaxing Chisheng Bearing Co.,Ltd has been manufacturing and exporting plain bearings(bushing) to almost all over […] Read More










 
 
No Review 


Complect Ecology
 12 Bulvarno-Kudriavska St, Kyiv, Kyiv city
Продам! ПРОДАМ! Реализация! Янтарь Украина, в Киеве. ТОРГ. Минус от 60$ 2 – 450$ 5 […] Read More










 
 
No Review 


Samanvay Solutions Pvt Ltd
 B-501,City Mall, Sector 19 Vashi ,New Mumbai-400705
Proresearch is provider of Research, Data Analytics and Business Support Solutions. Our Approach is centered […] Read More










 
 
No Review 


T-Shirt
 Bangladesh
Product Name: Boys’ Knit Tee Shirt Size: 3/6,6/9,9/12,12/18 months, 2T,3T,4T,5T year Fabrics : 100% Cotton […] Read More










 
 
No Review 


Decomex Latex Balloon Factory
 79 , Subway 281 , Ly Thuong Kiet Street , Ward 15 , District 11 , Ho Chi Minh City , Vietnam.
Since 1980, the manufacturing of highest quality latex balloons started in Ho Chi Minh, Vietnam. […] Read More










 
 
No Review 


sell OPS plastic packaging for food
 Odessa, Ukraine
Since 1997 “ITEX” company has been offering its customers the best range of packaging solutions […] Read More










 
 
No Review 


PP regrind
 132, Transilvaniei st., Buzau, Romania
We sell recycled PP granules, black color, MFI 5, IZOD 4. We can offer 100 […] Read More










 
 
No Review 


led dimmer, led controller
 15th Building, No.3, Pingdong 6th Road, Nanping Technical Industrial Park, Zhuhai, Guangdong, China
LTECH is a front-runner in the field of LED lighting controller. As the first high-end […] Read More




123»





 

 Recent Added BusinessPrestige Barbers New York July 31, 2017Old Style Conjure July 31, 2017LDPE wicket bags July 31, 2017Capital Carpet Company July 31, 2017Manufacturer Of Custom Safety Gloves & Safety Wears July 31, 2017bearing steel grit g40 July 31, 2017cast steel grit G16 July 31, 2017cast steel shot s330 July 31, 2017garnet sand 80# July 31, 2017HONEST HORSE (CHINA) HOLDING LIMITED. is established at 2005 year July 31, 2017Metal Plates System July 31, 2017LITAI MACHINE July 31, 2017Desiccant Nordic Dry July 31, 2017Hiseph cast iron cookware with enamel / pre-season oil surface FDA and LFGB are certificated July 31, 2017offerBK-EBDP 5F-ADB  4-CL-PMT FDU- PB22 4-fphp nmb2201 Lyophilize peptide Kigtropin 3-meo-pcp July 31, 2017Recent Commentsharrison saban on Byblos Internacional S.A.Igor Abramovich (Mr) on Nextronsureandran rajappa on Lightcraft Trading LLCsureandran rajappa on Lightcraft Trading LLCGolam Mustafa on Qingdao Tailong Steel Structure Co., Limited 

















Remove / Update a Company
 



No registration required for adding company





Add Products





 
 









                    
                                                        
                                                                                                                                                                                 
                    


2004-2015 diiig inc.

















